[5501]
(Missing)
[5502]
(Missing)
[5503]
(Missing)
[5504]
(Missing)
[5505]
(Missing)
[5506]
(Missing)
[5507]
(Missing)
[5508]
(Missing)
[5509]
(Missing)
[5510]
(Missing)
[5511]
(Missing)
[5512]
(Missing)
[5513]
(Missing)
[5514]
(Missing)
[5515]
(Missing)
[5516]
(Missing)
[5517]
(Missing)
[5518]
(Missing)
[5519]
(Missing)
[5520]
(Missing)
[5521]
(Missing)
[5522]
(Missing)
[5523]
(Missing)
[5524]
(Missing)
[5525]
(Missing)
[5526]
(Missing)
[5527]
(Missing)
[5528]
(Missing)
[5529]
(Missing)
[5530]
(Missing)
[5531]
(Missing)
[5532]
(Missing)
[5533]
(Missing)
[5534]
(Missing)
[5535]
(Missing)
[5536]
(Missing)
[5537]
(Missing)
[5538]
(Missing)
[5539]
(Missing)
[5540]
(Missing)
[5541]
(Missing)
[5542]
(Missing)
[5543]
(Missing)
[5544]
(Missing)
[5545]
(Missing)
[5546]
(Missing)
[5547]
(Missing)
[5548]
(Missing)
[5549]
(Missing)
[5550]
(Missing)
[5551]
(Missing)
[5552]
(Missing)
[5553]
(Missing)
[5554]
(Missing)
[5555]
(Missing)
[5556]
(Missing)
[5557]
(Missing)
[5558]
(Missing)
[5559]
(Missing)
[5560]
(Missing)
[5561]
(Missing)
[5562]
(Missing)
[5563]
(Missing)
[5564]
(Missing)
[5565]
(Missing)
[5566]
(Missing)
[5567]
(Missing)
[5568]
(Missing)
[5569]
(Missing)
[5570]
(Missing)
[5571]
(Missing)
[5572]
(Missing)
[5573]
(Missing)
[5574]
(Missing)
[5575]
(Missing)
[5576]
(Missing)
[5577]
(Missing)
[5578]
(Missing)
[5579]
(Missing)
[5580]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: The son of Adam abuses Dahr (the time), whereas I am Dahr since in My hand are the day and the night.
[5581]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: The son of Adam displeases Me by abusing Dahr (time), whereas I am Dahr--I alternate the night and the day.
[5582]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, said: The son of Adam causes Me pain as he says: Woe be upon the Time. None of you should say this: Woe be upon the Time, as I am the Time (because) I alternate the day and the night, and when I wish I can finish them up.
[5583]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should say: Woe be upon the Time, for verily Allah is the Time.
[5584]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not abuse Time, for it is Allah Who is the Time.
[5585]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should abuse Time for it is Allah Who is the Time, and none of you should call 'Inab (grape) as al-karm, for karm is a Muslim person.
[5586]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not use the word karm (for wine) for worthy of respect is the heart of a believer.
[5587]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Do not name grape as karm, for worthy of respect is a Muslim.
[5588]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should use the word al-harin (for grape) for the heart of a believer is karm (worthy of respect).
[5589]
Abu Huraira reported from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) various ahadith, one of which is this that he said: None of you should use the word al-karm for 'Inab, for karm (worthy of respect) is a Muslim person.
[5590]
'Alqama b. Wa'il reported, from his father, Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) having said: Do not say al-karm (for the word vine) but say al-habala (that is grape). This hadith has been reported by Alqama b. Wa'il on the authority of his father with a different chain of transmitters and with a slight variation of wording.
[5591]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should say: My bondman and my slave-girl, for all of you are the bondmen of Allah, and all your women are the slave-girls of Allah; but say: My servant, my girl, and my young man and my young girl.
[5592]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should say: My bondman, for all of you are the bondmen of Allah, but say: My young man, and the servant should not say: My Lord, but should say: My chief.
[5593]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of al-A'mash with the same chain of transmitters, and the words are that the servant should not say to his chief: My Lord, and Abu Mu'awiya made an addition: "For it is Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, Who is your Lord."
[5594]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) so many ahadith and one of them is this that Allah's Messenaer (may peace be upon him) said: None of you should say: Supply drink to your lord, feed your lord, hell) your lord in performing ablution, and none of you should say: My Lord. He should say: My chief, my patron; and none of you should say: My bondman, my slave-girl, but simply say: My boy, my girl, my servant.
[5595]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: None of you should say: "My soul has become evil," but he should say: "My soul has become remorseless." This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abfl Bakr with a slight variation of wording.
[5596]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abia Mu'iwiya with the same chain of transmitters.
[5597]
Abu Umama b. Sahl b. Hunaif, on the authority of his father, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: None of you should say: "My soul has become evil," but he should say: "My soul has become remorseless."
[5598]
Abd Sa'id Khudri reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: There was a woman from Bani Isra'il who was short-statured and she walked in the company of two tall women with wooden sandals in her feet and a ring of gold made of plates with musk filled in them and then looked up, and musk is the best of scents; then she walked between two women and they (the people) did not recognise her, and she made a gesture with her hand like this, and Shu'ba shook his hand in order to give an indication how she shook her hand.
[5599]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) made a mention of a woman of Bana Isra'il who had filled her ring with musk and musk is the most fragrant of the scents.
[5600]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who is presented with a flower should not reject it, for it is light to carry and pleasant in odour.
[5601]
Nafi' reported that when Ibn Umar wanted fumigation he got it from aloeswood without mixing anything with it, or he put camphor along with aloeswood and then said: This is how Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) fumigated.
[5602]
'Amr b. Sharid reported his father as saying : One day when I rode ehind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), he said (to me) : Do you remember any Poetry of Umayya b. Abu Salt. I said : Yes. He said: Then go on. I recited a couplet, and he said : Go on. Then I again recited a couplet and he said : Go on. I recited one hundred couplets (of his poetry). This hadith has been reported on the authority of Sharid through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5603]
'Amr b. Sharid reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messeniger (may peace be upon him) asked him to recite poetrv, the rest of the hadith is the same, out with this addition : "He (that is Umayya b. Abu Sharid was about to become a muslim and in the hadith transmitted on the authority, of Ibn Mahdi (the words are) "He was almost a Muslim in his poetry."
[5604]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The truest word spoken by an Arab (pre-Islamic) in poetry is this verse of Labid: "Behold! apart from Allah everything is vain."
[5605]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : The truest word uttered by a poet is this verse of Labid: "Behold ! apart from Allah everything is vain," and Umayya b. Abu Salt was almost a Muslim.
[5606]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : The truest verse recited by a poet is: Beliold ! apart from Allah everything is vain, " and Ibn Abu Salt was almost a Muslim.
[5607]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The truest couplet recited by a poet is : "Behold ! apart from Allah everything is vain," and he made no addition to it.
[5608]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : The truest word which the poet stated is the word of Labid : "Behold ! apart from Allah everything is vain."
[5609]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be opon him)as saying : It is better for a man's belly to be stuffld with pus which corrodes it than to stuff) one's mind with frivolous poetry. Abd Bakr has reported it with a slight variation Of wording.
[5610]
Sa'd reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying : It is better for the belly of any one of you to be stuffed with pus rather than to stuff (one's mind) with poetry.
[5612]
Buraida reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said : He who played chess is like one who dyed his band with the flesh and blood of swine.
[5613]
Abu Salama reported : I used to see dreams (and was so much perturbed) that I began to quiver and have temperature, but did not cover myself with a mantle. I met Abu Qatada and made a mention of that to him. He said: I heard Allali's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A good vision comes from Allah and a (bad) dream (hulm) from devil. So when one of.you sees a bad dream (hulm) which he does not like, he should spit on his left side thrice and seek refuge with Allah from its evil; then it will not harm him.
[5614]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Qatada, but there is no mention of the words of Abu Salama: "I saw dreams (which perturbed me) but I did not cover myself with a mantle."
[5615]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters, but it does not contain the words : "I felt disturbed because of that," and there is an addition of these words in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Yunus: "Then spit thrice on the left side when you get up from sleep."
[5616]
Abu Qatada reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A good vision is from Allah and a bad dream (hulm) is from the satan; so if one of you sees anything (in a dream which he dislikes, he should spit on his left side thrice and seek refuge with Allah from its evil, and then it will never harm him. Abu Salama said: I used to see dreams weighing more heavily upon me than a mountain; but since I heard this hadith I don't care for it (its burden).
[5617]
Abu Salama reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I used to see dreams, but the hadith transmitted on the authority of Laith b. Nu'man, the words of Abu Salama at the concluding part of the hadith are not mentioned. Ibn Rumh has reported in the hadith: "He (one who sleeps) should change the side on which he had been lying before."
[5618]
Abu Qatada reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : The good vision are from Allah and the evil dreams are from the satan. If one sees a dream which one does not like, one should spit on one's left side and seek the refuge of Allah from the satan; it will not do one any harm, and one should not disclose it to anyone and if one sees a good vision one should feel pleased but should not disclose it to anyone but whom one loves.
[5619]
Abu Salama replied: I used to see (such horrible dreams) that I fell ill. I saw Abu Qatada who also said: I used to see dreams which made me sick until I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Good dreams are from Allah, so if any one of you sees which he likes he should not disclose it to one but whow he loves, but if he sees something which he does not like he should spit on his left side thrice and seek refuge with Allah from the mischief of the satan and its mischief (i.e. of the dream), and he should not relate it to anyone, then it would not harm him.
[5620]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : If anyone sees a dream which he does not like, lie should spit on his left side.
[5621]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : When the time draws near (when the Resurrection is near) a believer's dream can hardly be false. And the truest vision will be of one who is himself the most truthful in speech, for the vision of a Muslim is the forty-fifth part of Prophecy, and dreams are of three types: one good dream which is a sort of good tidings from Allah ; the evil dream which causes pain is from the satan ; and the third one is a suggestion of one's own mind; so if any one of you sees a dream which he does not like he should stand tip and offer prayer and he should not relate it to people, and he said: I would love to see fetters (in the dream), but I dislike wearing of necklace, for the fetters is (an indication of) one's steadfastness in religion. The narrator said: I do not know whether this is a part of the hadith or the words of Ibn Sirin.
[5622]
Abu Huraira reported: I love to see fetters but I hate necklace (in a dream), for fetters signifies one's steadfastness in religion, and he also reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The vision of a believer is forty-sixth part of Prophecy.
[5623]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Huraira and the words are : "When the time draws near," the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5624]
Muhammad b. Sirin reported from Abu Huraira a hadith from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he mentioned in his hadith his words: "I dislike shackles," up to the end of his statement, but he made no mention of this: "A vision is a forty-sixth part of Prophecy."
[5625]
Ubida b. as-Samit reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The vision of a believer is the forty-sixth part of Prophecy.
[5626]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through another chain of transmitters.
[5627]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily the vision of a believer is one of the forty-sixth part of Prophecy.
[5628]
Allah's Messenger (may peace; be upon him) said: The vision of a Muslim which he sees or which is shown to him, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Alushir (the words are): "The pious dream is the forty-sixth part of Prophecy."
[5629]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The vision Qf a pious man is the forty-sixth part of Prophecy.
[5630]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yahyi b. Abu Kathir with the same chain of transmitters.
[5631]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huiaira through another chain of transmitters.
[5632]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The pious dreams are the seventieth part of Prophecy.
[5633]
This hadith has been reported on tile authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitters.
[5634]
A hadith like this has been reported on the authority of Nafi' with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "I think Ibn 'Uniar said: The seventieth part from Prophecy."
[5635]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who saw me in a dream in fact saw me, for the satan does not appear in my form.
[5636]
Abu Huraira reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who saw me in a dream would soon see me in the state of wakefulness, or as if he saw me in a state of wakefulness, for the satan does not appear in my form.
[5637]
Abu Qatada reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who saw me in dream in fact saw the truth (what is true).
[5638]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : He who saw me in sleep in fact saw me, for it is not possible for the satan to appear in my form; and he also said: When any one of you sees a hulm he should not inform anyone, for it is a sort of vain sport of devil in the state of sleep.
[5639]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: He who saw me in a dream in fact saw me, for the satan cannot assume my form.
[5640]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There came to him (the Holy Prophet) a desert Arab and said: I saw in a dream that I had been beheaded and I had been following it (the severed head). Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) reprimanded him saying: Do not inform about the vain sporting of devil with you during the night.
[5641]
Jabir reported that there came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a desert Arab and said: Allah's Messenger, I saw in the state of steep as if my head had been cut off and I had been moving on haltingly after it. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to that desert Arab: Do not narrate to the people the vain sporting of satan with you in your sleep and (the narrator) also said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in his subsequent address: None amongst you should narrate the vain sporting of devil with him in the dream.
[5642]
Jabir reported that a'person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, I have seen in the state of sleep as if my head had been cut off. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) laughed and said: When the satan plays with any one of you in the state of steep, do not inention it to the people; and in the hadith transmitted by Abu Bakr (the words are): "If one of you is played with, and he did not make any mention of the word: "Satan."
[5643]
It is reported eithfr on the authority of Ibn Abbas or on the authority of Abu Huraira that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, I saw while I was sleeping during the night (this vision) that there was a canopy from which butter and honey were trickling and I also saw people collecting them in the palms of their hands, some more, some less, and I also saw a rope connecting the earth with the sky and I saw you catching hold of it and rising towards the heaven; then another person after you catching hold of it and rising towards(Heaven); then another person catching hold of it, but it was broken while it was rejoined for him and he also climbed up. Abu Bakr said: Allah's Messenger, may my father be sacrificed for you, by Allah, allow me to interpret it. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sail: Well, give its interpretation. Thereupon Abu Bakr said: The canopy signifies the canopy of Islam and that what it trickles out of it in the form of butter and honey is the Holy Qur'an and its sweetness and softness and what the people get hold of it in their palms implies major portion of the Qur'an or the small portion; and so far as the rope joining the sky with the earth is concerned, it is the Truth by which you stood (in the worldly life) and by which Allah would raise you (to Heaven). Then the person after you would take hold of it and he would also climb up with the help of it. Then another person would take hold of it and climb up with the help of it. Then another person would take hold of it and it would be broken; then it would be rejoined for him and he would climb up with the help of it. Allah's Messenger, may my father be taken as a ransom for you, tell me whether I have interpreted it currectly or I have made an error. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: You have interpreted a part of it correctly and you have erred in interpreting a part of it. Thereupon he said: Allah's Messenger, by Allah, tell me that part where I have committed an error. Thereupon he said: Don't take oath.
[5644]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that there came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) a person as he was returning from Uhud and lie 'said: Allah's Messenger, I saw in sleep during the night a canopy trickling butter and honey; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5645]
It is reported either on the authority of Ibn 'Abbas or on that of Abu Huraira that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Verily I saw during the night a canopy ; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5646]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to say to his Companions: He who amongst you sees a vision should narrate it and I would interpret it for him, and a person came and said: Allah's Messenger, I saw a canopy. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[5647]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I saw during the night that which a person sees during the sleep as if we are in the house of 'Uqba b. Rafi' that there was brought to us the fresh dates of Ibn Tab. I interpreted it as the sublimity for us in the world and good ending in the Hereafter and that our religion is good.
[5648]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I saw in a dream that I was using miswak and the two persons contended to get it from me, the one being older than the other one. I gave the miswak to the younger one. It was said to me to give that to the older one and I gave it to the older one.
[5649]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I saw in sleep that I was about to migrate from Mecca to a land abounding in palmtrees and I guessed that it would be Yamama or Hajar, but it was the city of Yathrib (the old name of Medina), and I saw in this dream of mine that I was brandishing a sword and its upper end was broken and this is what fell (in the form of misfortune to the believers on the Day of Ubud). I brandished (the sword) for the second time and it became all right and this is what came to be true when Allah granted us victory and solidarity of the believers. And I saw therein cows also and Allah is the Doer of good. These meant the group from amongst the believers on the Day of Ubud and the goodness which Allah brought after that and the reward of attestation of his Truth which Allah brought to us after the Day of Badr.
[5650]
Ibn Abbas reported that Musailima al-Kadhdhab (the greater liar) (who claimed prophethood after the death of the Holy Prophet) came during the lifetime of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) to Medina and said: If Muhammad assigns his caliphate to me after him I would follow, and there came along with him a large body of persons of his tribe and there came to him Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) along with Thabit b. Qais b. Shammas and the Prophet of Allah (may peace be upon him) had a piece of wood in his hand until he came in front of Musailima in the company of his companions and said: If you were to ask even this (wood), I would never give it to you. I am not going to do anything against the will of God in your case, and if you turn away (from what I say) Allah will destroy you. And I find you in the same state which I was shown (in the dream) and here is Thabit and he would answer you on my behalf. He (the Holy Prophet) then went back. Ibn 'Abbas said: I asked the (meanings of the) words of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): "You are the same what I was made to see about you in my dream." and Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger. (may peace be upon him) said: While I was sleeping I saw in my hands two gold bangles. This had a disturbing effect upon me and I was given a suggestion in the sleep that I should blow over them, so I blew over them and they were no more. And I interpreted these (two bangles) as the two great liars who would appear after me and the one amongst them was 'Anasi the inhabitant of San'a' and the other one Musailima the inhabitant of Yamama.
[5651]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: While I was sleeping, the treasures of the earth were presented to me and I was made to wear in my hands two gold bangles. I felt a sort of burden upon me and I was disturbed and it was suggested to me that I should blow over them, so I blew and both of them disappeared. I interpreted them as two great liars who would appear at any time, one is the inhabitant of Sana' and the other is that of Yamama.
[5652]
Samura b. Jundab reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had performed his dawn prayer he turned his face towards them (that is towards his Companions) and said: Did any one of you see any vision last night?
[5653]
Wathila b. al-Asqa' reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Verily Allah granted eminence to Kinana from amongst the descendants of Isma'il and he granted eminence to the Quraish amongst Kinana and he granted eminence to the Quraish amongst Banu Hashim and he granted me eminencece from the tribe of Banu Hashim.
[5654]
Jabir b. Samura reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying : I recognise the stone in Mecca which used to pay me salutations before my advent as a Prophet and I recognise that even now.
[5655]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I shall be pre-eminent arriongst the descendants of Adam on the Day of Resurrection and I will be the first intercessor and the first whose intercession will be accepted (by Allah).
[5656]
Anas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) called for water and he was given a vessel and the people began to perform ablution in that and I counted (the persons) and they were between fifty and eighty and I saw water which was spouting from his fingers.
[5657]
Anas b. Malik reported : I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) during the time of the afternoon prayer and the people asking for water for performing ablution which they did not find. (A small quantity) of water was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he placed his hand in that vessel and com- manded people to perform ablution. I raw water spouting from his fingers and the people performing ablution until the last amongst them performed it.
[5658]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and his Companions were at a place known as az-Zaura' (az-Zaurd' is a place in the bazar of Medina near the mosque) that he called for a vessel containing water. He put his hand in that. And there began to spout (water) between his fingers and all the Companions performed ablution. Qatada, one of the narrators in the chain of narrators, said: Abu Hamza (the kunya of Hadrat Anas b. Malik), how many people were they? He said: They were about three hundred.
[5659]
Anas reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was at az-Zaura' and a vessel containing water was brought to him in which his finger could not be completely dipped or completely covered; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5660]
Jabir reported that Umm Malik used to send clarified butter in a small skin to the Apostle of Allah (may peace be upon him). Her sons would come to her and ask for seasoning when they had nothing with them (in the form of condiments) and she would go to that (skin) in which she offered (clarified butter) to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and she would find in that clarified butter and it kept providing her with seasoning for her household until she had (completely) squeezed it. She came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and (informed him about it). Thereupon, he (the Holy Prophet) said: Did you squeeze it? She said: Yes. Thereupon he said: If you had left it in that very state, it would have kept on provid- ing you (the clarified butter) on end.
[5661]
Jabir reported that a person came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and asked for food. And he gave him half a wasq of barley, and the person and his wife and their guests kept on making use of it (as a food) until he weighed it (in order to find out the actual quantity, and it was no more). He came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) (and informed him about it). He said: Had you not weighed it, you would be eating out of it and it would have remained intact for you.
[5662]
Mu'adh b. Jabal reported that he went along with Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in the expedition of Tabuk and he (the Holy Prophet) combined the prayers. He offered the noon and afternoon prayers together and the sunset and night prayers together and on the other day he deferred the prayers; he then came out and offered the noon and afternoon prayers together. He then went in and (later on) came out and then after that offered the sunset and night prayers together and then said: God willing, you would reach by tomorrow the fountain of Tabuk and you should not come to that until it is dawn, and he who amongst you happens to go there should not touch its water until I come. We came to that and two persons (amongst) us reached that fountain ahead of us. It was a thin flow of water like the shoelace. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked them whether they had touched the water. They said: Yes. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) scolded them, and he said to them what he had to say by the will of God. The people then took water of the fountain in their palms until it became somewhat significant and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) washed his hands and his face too in it, and then, took it again in that (fountain) and there gushed forth abundant water from that fountain, until all the people drank to their fill. He then said: Mu'adh, it is hoped that if you live long you would see its water irrigating well the gardens.
[5663]
Abu Humaid as-Sa'idi reported: We went out with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on the expedition to Tabuk and we came to a wadi where there was a garden belonging to a woman. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said. Make an assessment (of the price of its fruit). And Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) also made an assessment and it was ten wasqs. He asked that lady (to calculate the amount) until they would, God willing, come back to her. So we proceeded on until we came to Tabuk and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The violent storm will overtake you during the night, so none amongst you should stand up and he who has a camel with him should hobble it firmly. A violent storm blew and a person who had stood up was carried away by the storm and thrown between the mountains of Tayy. Then the messenger of the son of al 'Alma', the ruler of Aila, came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with a letter and a gift of a white mule. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) wrote him (the reply) and presented him a cloak. We came back until we halted in the Wadi al-Qura. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) asked that lady about her garden and the price of the fruits in that. She said: Ten wasqs. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I am going to depart, and he who amongst you wishes may depart with me but he who wants to stay may stay. We resumed the journey until we came to the outskirts of Medina. (It was at this time) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: This is Taba, this is Uhud, that is a mountain which loves us and we love it, and then said: The best amongst the houses of the Ansar is the house of Bani Najjar. Then the house of Bani Abd al-Ashhal, then the house of Bani Abd al-Harith b. Khazraj, then the house of Bani Sa'ida, and there is goodness in all the houses of the Ansar. Said b. Ubada came to us and Abu Usaid said to him: Did you not see that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) has declared the houses of the Ansar good and he has kept us at the end. Said met Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, you have declared the house of the Ansar as good and have kept us at the end, whereupon he said: Is it not enough for you that you have been counted amongst the good.
[5664]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Amr b. Yahya with the same chain of transmitters up to the words: There is good in all the houses of the Ansar, and there is no mention of the subsequent event pertaining to Sa'd b. 'Ubada.
[5665]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: We went along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) on an expedition towards Najd and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) found us in a valley abounding in thorny trees. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stayed for rest under a tree and he suspended his sword by one of its branches under which he was taking rest. The persons scattered in the valley and they also began to take rest under the shade of trees, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A person came to me while I was asleep and he took hold of the sword. I woke up and found him standing upon my head and I had hardly become alert (and saw) that the sword was in his hand. And he said: Who can protect you from me? I said: Allah. He again said: Who can protect you from me? I said: Allah. He put his sword in the sheath (and you can see) this man sitting here. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not in any way touch him.
[5666]
Jabir b.'Abdullah al-Ansiri, who was one amongst the Companions of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that he went on an expedition along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) towards Najd and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stayed there, and when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came back he also came back along with him. They, for one day, stayed for rest; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5667]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: We went along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and as we reached the place Dhat-ur-Riqa'; the rest of the hadith is the same, but there is no mention of the word that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not harm him.
[5668]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of that guidance and knowledge with which Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, has sent me is that of rain falling upon the earth. There is a good piece of land which receives the rainfall (eagerly) and as a result of it there is grown in it herbage and grass abundantly. Then there is a land hard and barren which retains water and the people derive benefit from it and they drink it and make the animals drink. Then there is another land which is barren. Neither water is retained in it, nor is the grass grown in it. And that is the similitude of the first one who develops the understanding of the religion of Allah and it becomes a source of benefit to him with which Allah sent me. (The second one is that) who acquires the knowledge of religion and imparts it to others. (Then the other type is) one who does not pay attention to (the revealed knowledge) and thus does not accept guidance of Allah with which I have been sent.
[5669]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of mine and of that with which Allah sent me is that of a person who came to us and said: O people, I have seen an army with my eyes and I am a plain warner (and issue you warning) that you should immediately manage to find an escape. A group of people from amongst them paying heed (to his warning) fled to a place of protection and a group amongst them belied him and the morning overtook them in their houses and the army attacked them and killed them and they were routed. And that is the similitude of the one who obeyed me, followed with which I had been sent and the similitude of the other is of one who disobeyed and belied me and the Truth with which I have been sent.
[5670]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of mine and that of my Umma is that of a person who lit fire and there began to fall into it insects and moths. And I am there to hold you back, but you plunge into it.
[5671]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported: Abu Huraira reported us some ahadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) amongst many, (and) one is this that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A person lit fire and when the atmosphere was aglow, moths and insects began to fall into the fire, but I am there to hold them back, but they are plunging into it despite my efforts, and he further added: That is your example and mine. I am there to hold you back from fire and to save you from it, but you are plunging into it despite my efforts.
[5672]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying. My example and your example is that of a person who lit the fire and insects and moths began to fall in it and he would be making efforts to take them out, and I am going to hold you back from fire, but you are slipping from my hand.
[5673]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of mine and that of the Apostles (before me) is that of a person who constructed a building and he built it fine and well and the people went round it saying: Never have we seen a building more imposing than this. but for one brick, and I am that brick (with which you give the finishing touch to the building).
[5674]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of mine and that of the Apostles before me is that of a person who built a house quite imposing and beautiful and he made it complete but for one brick in one of its corners. People began to walk round it, and the building pleased them and they would say: But for this brick your building would have been perfect. Muhammad (may peace be upon him) said: And I am that final brick.
[5675]
Abu Hurairh reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of mine and that of the Apostles before me is that of a person who built a house quite imposing and beautiful, but for one brick in one of its corners. People would go round it, appreciating the building, but saying: Why has the brick not been fixed here? He said: I am that brick and I am the last of the Apostles.
[5676]
Abu Sa'id reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of mine and that of the Apostles; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5677]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The similitude of mine and that of the Apostles is like that of a person who built a house and he completed it and made it perfect but for the space of a brick. People entered therein and they were surprised at it and said: Had there been a brick (it would have been complete in all respects). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I am that place where the brick (completing the building is to be placed), and I have come to finalise the chain of Apostles.
[5678]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5679]
Abu Musa reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: When Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, intends to show mercy to an Umma from amongst His servants He calls back His Apostle to his eternal home and makes him a harbinger and recompense in the world to come; and when He intends to cause destruction to an Umma, He punishes it while its Apostle is alive and He destroys it as he (the Apostle) witnesses it and he cools his eyes by destruction as they had belied him and disobeyed his command.
[5680]
Jundab reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I shall be there at the Cistern before you.
[5681]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jundab through another chain of transmitters.
[5682]
Sahl (b. Sa'd) reported: I heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying : I shall go to the Cistern before you and he who comes would drink and he who drinks would never feel thirsty, and there would come to me people whom I would know and who would know me. Then there would be intervention between me and them. Abu Hazim said that Nu'man b. Abu 'Ayyash heard it and I narrated to them this hadith, and said: Is it this that you heard Sahl saying? He said: Yes, and I bear witness to the fact that I heard it from Abu Sa'id Khudri also, but he made this addition that he (the Holy Prophet) would say: They are my followers, and it would be said to him: You do not know what they did after you and I will say to them: Woe to him who changes (his religion) after me.
[5683]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudri through another chain of transmitters.
[5684]
Abdullah b. 'Amr al-'As, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: My Cistern (is as wide and broad that it requires) a motith's journey (to go round it) all, and its sides are equal and its water is whiter than silver, and its odour is more fragrant than the fragrance of musk, and its jugs (placed round it) are like stars in the sky; and he who would drink from it would never feel thirsty after that. Asma', daughter of Abu Bakr said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I would be on the Cistern and so that I would be seeing those who would be coming to me from you, but some people would be detained (before reaching me). I would say: My Lord, they are my followers and belong to my Umma, and it would be said to me: Do you know what they did after you? By Allah, they did not do good after you, and they turned back upon their heels. He (the narrator) said: lbn Abu Mulaika used to say (in supplication): O Allah, I seek refuge with Thee that we should turn back upon our heels or put to any trial about our religion.
[5685]
'A'isha reported : I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say in the company of his Companions: I would be on the Cistern waiting for those who would be coming to me from amongst you. By Allah, some persons would be prevented from coming to me, and I would say: My Lord, they are my followers and people of my Umma. And He would say,: You don't know what they did after you; they had been constantly turning back on their heels (from their religion).
[5686]
Umm Salama, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said I used to hear from people making a mention of the Cistern, but I did not hear about it from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). One day while a girl was combing me I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say: "O people." I said to that girl: Keep away from me. She said : He (the Holy Prophet) has addressed the men only and he has not invited the attention of the women. I said: I am amongst the people also (and have thus every right to listen to the things pertaining to religion). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : I shall be your harbinger on the Cistern; therefore, be cautious lest one of you should come (to me) and may be driven away like a stray camel. I would ask the reasons, and it would be said to me: You don't know what innovations they made after you. And I would then also say: Be away.
[5687]
Umm Salama reported that she heard Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) saying this as he was sitting on the pulpit and she was getting her hair combed. (He uttered these words) : "O people." And she said to one who was combing: Leave my head; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5688]
Uqba b. 'Amir reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) one day went out and he offered prayer over the martyrs of Uhud just as prayer is offered over the dead. He then came back and sat on pulpit and said: I shall be present there (at the Cistern) before you. I shall be your witness and, by Allah, I perceive as if I am seeing with my own eyes my Cistern at this very state and I have been given the keys of the treasures of the earth or the keys of the earth and, by Allah, I am not afraid concerning you that you would associate anything (with Allah after me), but I am afraid that you would be vying with one another (for the possession of) the treasures of the earth.
[5689]
Uqba b. 'Amir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Allah's Messenger offered prayer over those who had fallen matyrs at Uhud. He then climbed the pulpit as if someone is saying good-bye to the living and the dead, and then said: I shall be there as your predecesor on the Cistern before you, and it is as wide as the distance between Aila and Juhfa (Aila is at the top of the gulf of 'Aqaba). I am not afraid that you would associate anything with Allah after me, but I am afraid that you may be (allured) by the world and (vie) with one another (in possessing material wealth) and begin killing one another, and you would be destroyed as were destroyed those who had gone before you. 'Uqba said that that was the last occasion that he saw Allah's Massenger on the pulpit.
[5690]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying; I shall be there at the Cistern before you, and I shall have to contend for some people, but I shall have to yield. I would be saying: My Lord, they are my friends, they are my friends, and it would be said: You don't know what innovations they made after you.
[5691]
The hadith has been narrated on the authority ot al-A'mash with the same chain of transmitters but no mention is made of: "They are my companions; they are my companions."
[5692]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[5693]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hudhaifa through another chain of transmitters.
[5694]
Haritha reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: His Cistern would be as extensive as the distance between San'a' and Medina. Mustaurid (one of the narrators) said: Did you not hear anything about the utensils? Thereupon he said. No. Mustaurid said: You would find that the utensils would be like stars.
[5695]
Haritha b. Wahb al-Khuza'i reported Allah's Messeiiger's (may peace be upon him) words concerning the Cistern like it, but he made no mention of the words of Mustaurid.
[5696]
Ibn 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There is before you a Cistern and the distance between its two sides is as it is between Jarba' and Adhruh.
[5697]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn 'Umar and the words are: That he said there would be before you a Cistern extending from jarba' and Adhruh and the same has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Muthanna and the wording is: "My Cistern."
[5698]
A hadith like this has been transmitted on the authority, of 'Ubaidullah with this addition: Ubaidullah was asked (about these two names, i.e. Jarba' and Adhruh). He said: These are the two towns of Syria and there is between them the distance which can be covered in three nights, and the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ibn Bishr (the words are). "Three days."
[5699]
A hadith like this has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Umar through another chain of transmitters.
[5700]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be before you a Cistern (as extensive) as there is the distance between Jarba' and Adhruh and there would be jugs like stars in the sky; he who would come to that and drink from it would never feel thirsty after that.
[5701]
Abu Dharr said: Allah's Messenger, what about the vessels of that Cistern? He said: By Him in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, the vessels would outnumber the stars in the sky and its planets shining on a dark cloudless night. These would be the vessels of Paradise. He who drinks out of it (the Cistern) would never feel thirsty. There would flow in it two spouts from Paradise and he who would drink out of it would not feel thirsty; and the distance between its (two corners) is that between 'Amman and Aila, and its water is whiter than milk and sweeter than honey.
[5702]
Thauban reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: I would be pushing back from my Cistern the crowd of people. I would strike away from it (the Cistern) with my staff the people of Yemen until the water (of the Haud) would spout forth upon them. He was asked about its breadth. He said: From this place of mine to 'Amman, and he was asked about the drink and he said: It is whiter than milk and sweeter than honey. There would spout into it two streamlets having their sources in Paradise. the one is from gold and the other is from silver. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters and the words are: "I would be on the Day of Resurrection near the bank of the Cistern."
[5703]
Thaubin reported this hadith pertaining to the Cistern. Muhammad b. Bashshar said: I said to Yahya b. Hammad: This is the hadith that I heard from Abu 'Awana and he said: I also heard it from Shu'ba. I said: Narrate that to me and he narrated that to me.
[5704]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: I will drive away from my Cistern people just as the stray camels are driven away. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain ot transmitters.
[5705]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: My Cistern would be as extensive as the distance between Aila and San'a, of Yemen, and there would be in it jugs like stars in the sky.
[5706]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: Some persons from amongst my associates would turn to my Cistern; when I would see them and they would be presented to me, they would be detained in the way while coming to me. I would say: My Lord, they are my companions, they are my companions, and it would be said to me: You don't know what innovations they made after you.
[5707]
Anas reported a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he made this addition: "The vessels would be as numerous as the number of stars.
[5708]
Anas b. Milik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There would be such a vast distance between the sides of my Cistern as it is between Sana' and Medina.
[5709]
Anas reported this hadith with this change that there was some doubt between (places mentioned) and there is a slight variation of wording.
[5710]
Anas reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying: You would be shown in it jugs of gold and silver (as numerous) as the number of stars in the sky. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Anas b. Malik with this addition: "More numerous than stars in the sky."
[5711]
Jabir b. Samura reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Behold, I shall be present ahead of you on the Cistern, and the distance between its different sides would be like that between Sana' and Aila, and its jugs would be like stars in the sky.
[5712]
'Amir b. Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported: I wrote (a letter) to Jabir b. Samura (and it was sent) through my servant Nafi' asking him to inform me about something (pertaining to the Haud Kauthar). He wrote to me: I heard him (the Holy Prophet) say: I shall be there ahead of you at the Haud Kauthar.
[5713]
Sa'd reported that on the Day of Ubud I saw on the right side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and on his left side two persons dressed in white clothes and whom I did not see before nor after that, and they were Gabriel and Michael (Allah be pleased with both of them).
[5714]
Sa'd b. Abu Waqqas reported: I saw on the right side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and on his left side two persons with white clothes on the Day of Uhtid fighting a desperate fight, and I saw them neither before nor after that.
[5715]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was the sublimest among people (in character) and the most generous amongst them and he was the bravest of men. One night the people of Medina felt disturbed and set forth in the direction of a sound when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) met them on his way back as he had gone towards that sound ahead of them. He was on the horse of Abu Talha which had no saddle over it, and a sword was slung round his neck, and he was saying: There was nothing to be afraid of, and he also said: We found it (this horse) like a torrent of water (indicating its swift-footedness), whereas the horse had been slow before that time.
[5716]
Anas reported that there was consternation in Medina. The Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) borrowed the horse from Abu Talha which was called Mandub. He rode it and said: We have found no reason for consternation, and we have found it to be (as quick as a torrent) of water.
[5717]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Anas with a slight variation of wording.
[5718]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was the most generous of people in charity, but he was generous to the utmost in the month of Ramadan. Gabriel (peace be upon him) would meet him every year during the month of Ramadin until it ended, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) recited to him the Qur'an; and when Gabriel met him Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was most generous in giving charity like the blowing wind.
[5719]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters.
[5720]
Anas b. Malik reported: I served the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) for ten years, and, by Allah, he never said to me any harsh word, and he never said to me about a thing as to why I had done that and as to why I had not done that. Abu Rabi' has made this addition (in this narration): "The work which a servant should do." There is no mention of his words "By Allah".
[5721]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[5722]
Anas reported: When Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Medina, Abla Talha took hold of my hand and brought me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, Anas is a prudent young boy, and he will serve you. He (Anas) said: I served him in journey and at home, but, by Allah, he never asked me about a thing which I did as to why I did so, nor about a thing which I did not do as to why I had not done that.
[5723]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I served the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) for nine years, and I do not know (of any instance) when he said to me: Why you have done this and that, and he never found fault with me in anything.
[5724]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had the best disposition amongst people. He sent me on an errand one day, and I said: By Allah, I would not go. I had, however, this idea in my mind that I would do as Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had commanded me to do. I went out until I happened to come across children who had been playing in the street. In the meanwhile, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came there and he caught me by the back of my neck from behind me. As I looked towards him I found him smiling and he said: Unais, did you go where I commanded you to go? I said: Allah's Messenger, yes, I am going. Anas further said: I served him for nine years but I know not that he ever said to me about a thing which I had done why I did that, or about a thing I had left as to why I had not done that.
[5725]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was the best amongst people in disposition and behaviour.
[5726]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: It never happened that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked for anything and he said: No.
[5727]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. 'Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[5728]
Musa b. Anas reported on the authority of his father: It never happened that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was asked anything for the sake of Islam and he did not give that. There came to him a person and he gave him a large flock (of sheep and goats) and he went back to his people and said: My people, embrace Islam, for Muhammad gives so much charity as if he has no fear of want.
[5729]
Anas 'b. Malik reported that a person requested Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) to give him a very large flock and he gave that to him. He came to his tribe and said: O people, embrace Islam. By Allah, Muhammad donates so much as if he did not fear want. Anas said that the person embraced Islam for the sake of the world but later he became Muslim until Islam became dearer to him than the world and what it contains.
[5730]
Ibn Shihab reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went on the expedition of Victory, i.e. the Victory of Mecca, and then he went out along with the Muslims and they fought at Hunain, and Allah granted victory to his religion and to the Muslims, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave one hundred camels to Safwan b. Umayya. He again gave him one hundred camels, and then again gave him one hundred camels. Sa'id b. Musayyib said that Safwan told him: (By Allah) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave me what he gave me (and my state of mind at that time was) that he was the most detested person amongst people in my eyes. But he continued giving to me until now he is the dearest of people to me.
[5731]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: In case we get wealth from Bahrain, I would give you so much and so much; he made an indication of it with both his hands. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) died before wealth from Bahrain came, and it fell to the lot of Abu Bakr after him. He commanded the announcer to make announcement to the effect that he to whom Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had held out promise or owed any debt should come (to him). I came and said: Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) had said to me: In case there comes to us the wealth of Bahrain I shall give you so much, and so much. Abu Bakr took a handful (of the coins) and gave that to me once and asked me to count them I counted them as five hundred dinars and he said: Here is double of this for you.
[5732]
Jabir b. 'Abdullah reported: When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) died, there came to Abfi Bakr wealth from al-'Ala' b. al-Hadrami. Abu Bakr said: He to whom Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) owed any debt or held out any promise should come to us; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5733]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: A child was born into me this night and I named him after the name of my father Ibrihim. He then sent him to Umm Saif, the wife of a blacksmith who was called Abu Saif. He (the Holy Prophet) went to him and I followed him until we reached Abu Saif and he was blowing fire with the help of blacksmith's bellows and the house was filled with smoke. I hastened my step and went ahead of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Abu Saif, stop it, as there comes Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him). He stopped and Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) called for the child. He embraced him and said what Allah had desired. Anas said: I saw that the boy breathed his last in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). The eyes of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) shed tears and he said: Ibrahim, our eyes shed tears and our hearts are filled with grief, but we do not say anything except that by which Allah is pleased. O Ibrahim, we are grieved for you.
[5734]
Anas b. Malik reported: I have never seen anyone more kind to one's family than Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), and Ibrahim was sent to the suburb of Medina for suckling. He used to go there and we accompanied him. He entered the house, and it was filled with smoke as his foster-father was a bricksmith. He took him (his son Ibrihim) and kissed him and then came back. 'Amr said that when Ibrihim died. Allah's LMessenger (may peace be upon him) said: Ibrihim is my son and he dies as a suckling babe. He has now two foster-mothers who would complete his suckling period in Paradise.
[5735]
'A'isha (Allah be pleased with her) reported that there came a few desert Arabs to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Do you kiss your children? He said: Yes. Thereupon they said: By Allah but we do not kiss our children. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Then what can I do if Allah has deprived you of mercy? Ibn Numair said: (We has deprived) your heart of mercy.
[5736]
Abu Huraira reported that al-Aqra' b. Habis saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) kissing Hasan. He said: I have ten children, but I have never kissed any one of them, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He who does not show mercy (towards his children), no mercy would be shown to him.
[5737]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir b. 'Abdullah through different chains of transmitters and the words are: "That the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) said: He who shows no mercy to the people, Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, does not show mercy to him."
[5738]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir through another chain of transmitters.
[5739]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was more modest than the virgin behind the curtain (or in the apartment), and when he disliked anything, we recognised that from his face.
[5740]
Masruq reported: We went to Abdullah b. 'Amr when Mu'dwiya came to Kufa, and he made a mention of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: He was never immoderate in his talk and he never reviled others. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) also said: The best amongst you are those who are best in morals. Uthman said: When he came to Kufa along with Mu'awiya... (The rest of the hadith is the same).
[5741]
This hadith had been narrated on the authority of al-A'mash through another chain of transmitters also.
[5742]
Simak b. Harb reported: I said to Jabir b. Samura: Did you have the privilege of sitting in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: Yes, very frequently, and added: He did not stand up (and go) from the place where he offered the dawn prayer until the sun rose, and after the rising of the sun he stood up, and they (his Companions) entered into conversation with one another and they talked of the things (that they did during the Days of Ignorance), and they laughed (on their unreasonable and ridiculous acts). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled only.
[5743]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had in one of his journeys his black slave who was called Anjasha along with him. He goaded by singing the songs of camel-driver. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Anjasha, drive slowly as you are driving (the mounts who are carrying) glass vessels
[5744]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through another chain of transmitters.
[5745]
Anas reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came to his wives as the camel-driver who was called Anjasha had been, driving (the camels) on which (they were riding). Thereupon he said: Anjasha, be careful, drive slowly for you are driving the mounts who carry vessels of glass. Abu Qilaba said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) uttered words which if someone had uttered amongst you, you would have found fault with him.
[5746]
Anas b. Malik reported that Umm Sulaim was with the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and a camel-driver had been driving (the camels) oil which they were riding. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Anjasha, drive slowly, for you are carrying (on the camels) vessels of glass.
[5747]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had a camel-driver who had a very melodious voice. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Anjasha, drive slowly; do not break the vessels of glass, meaning the weak women.
[5748]
Anas reported this hadith through another chain of transmitters, but he made no mention of a camel-driver having a melodious voice.
[5749]
Anas b. Malik reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had completed his dawn prayer, the servants of Medina came to him with utensils containing water, and no utensil was brought in which he did not dip his hand; and sometime they came in the cold dawn (and he did not feel reluctant in acceding to their request even in the cold weather) and dipped his hand in them.
[5750]
Anas reported: I saw when the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) got his hair cut by the barber, his Companions came round him and they eagerly wanted that no hair should fall but in the hand of a person.
[5751]
Anas reported that a woman had a partial derangement in her mind, so she said. Allah's Messellaer, I want something from you. He said: Mother of so and so, see on which side of the road you would like (to stand and talk) so that I may do the needfull for you. He stood aside with her on the roadside until she got what she needed.
[5752]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said that whenever he had to choose between two things he adopted the easier one, provided it was nor sin, but if it was any sin he was the one wio was the farthest from it of the people; and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) never took revenge from anyone because of his personal grievance, unless what Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, had made inviolable had been violated.
[5753]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shibab through another chain of transmitters.
[5754]
'A'isha reported: Never did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) make a choice between two things but adopting the easier one as compared to the difficult one, but his choice for the easier one was only in case it did not involve any sin, but if it involved sin he was the one who was the farthest from it amongst the people.
[5755]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5756]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) never beat anyone with his hand, neither a woman nor a servant, but only, in the case when he had been fighting in the cause of Allah and he never took revenge for anything unless the things made inviolable by Allah were made violable; he then took revenge for Allah, the Exalted and Glorious.
[5757]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5758]
Jabir b. Samura reported: I prayed along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the first prayer. He then went to his family and I also went along with him when he met some children (on the way). He began to pat the cheeks of each one of them. He also patted my cheek and I experienced a coolness or a fragrance of his hand as if it had been brought out from the scent bag of a perfumer.
[5759]
Anas reported: I never smelt ambergris or musk as fragrant as the fragrance of the body of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I never touched brocade or silk and found it as soft as the body of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[5760]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had a very fair complexion and (the drops) of his perspiration shone like pearls, and when he walked he walked inclining forward, and I never touched brocade and silk (and found it) as soft as the softness of the palm of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I never smelt musk or ambergris and found its fragrance as sweet as the fragrance of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[5761]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to come to our house and there was perspiration upon his body. My mother brought a bottle and began to pour the sweat in that. When Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) got up he said: Umm Sulaini, what is this that you are doing? Thereupon she said: That is your sweat which we mix in our perfume and it becomes the most fragrant perfume.
[5762]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) came to the house of Umm Sulaim and slept in her bed while she was away from her house. On the other day too he slept in her bed. She came and it was said to her: It is Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) who is having siesta in your house, lying in your bed. She came and found him sweating and his sweat falling on the leather cloth spread on her bed. She opened her scent-bag and began to fill the bottles with it. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was startled and woke up and said: Umm Sulaim, what are you doing? She said: Allah's Messenger, we seek blessings for our children through it. Thereupon he said: You have done something right.
[5763]
Umm Sulaim reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) visited her house and (took rest) and she spread a piece of cloth for him and he had had a siesta on it. And he sweated profusely and she collected his sweat and put it in a perfume and in bottles. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said: Umm Sulaim, what is this? She said: It is your sweat, which I put in my perfume. Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sweated in cold weather when revelation descended upon him.
[5764]
'A'isha reported: When revelation descended upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) even during the cold days, his forehead perspired.
[5765]
'A'isha reported that Harith b. Hisham asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him): How does the the wahi (inspiration) come to you? He said: At times it comes to me like the ringing of a bell and that is most severe for me and when it is over I retain that (what I had received in the form of wahi), and at times an Angel in the form of a human being comes to me (and speaks) and I retain whatever he speaks.
[5766]
'Ubida b. Samit reported that when wahi (inspiration) descended upon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), he felt a burden on that account and the colour of his face underwent a change.
[5767]
'Ubida b. Samit reported that when wahi descended upon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), he lowered his head and so lowered his Companions their heads, and when (this state) was over, he raised his head.
[5768]
Ibn Abbas reported that the People of the Book used to let their hair fall (on their foreheads) and the polytheists used to part them on their heads, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) liked to conform his behaviour to the People of the Book in matters in which he received no command (from God); so Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) let fall his hair upon his forehead, and then he began to part it after this.
[5769]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters.
[5770]
Al-Bara' reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was of medium height, having broad shoulders, with his hair hanging down on the lobes of his ears. He put on a red mantle over him, and never have I seen anyone more handsome than Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).
[5771]
Al-Bara' reported: Never did I see anyone more handsome than Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) in the red mantle. His hair had been hanging down on the shoulders and his shoulders were very broad, and he was neither very tall nor short-statured. Ibn Kuraib said he had hair.
[5772]
Al-Bara' reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had the most handsome face amongst men and he had the best disposition and he was neither very tall nor short-statured.
[5773]
Qatada reported: I asked Anas b. Malik: How was the hair of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? Thereupon he said: His hair was neither very curly nor very straight, and they hung over his shoulders and earlobes.
[5774]
Anas reported that the hair of Allah's Messenger (may. peace be upon him) came upon his shoulders.
[5775]
Anas reported that the hair of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) reached half of the earlobe.
[5776]
Jabir b. Samura reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had a broad face with reddish (wide) eyes, and lean heels. Shu'ba reported: I said to Simak: What does this dali-ul-fam mean? And he said: This means broad face. I said: What does this ashkal mean? He said: Long in the slit of the eye. I said: What is this manhus-ul-aqibain? He said: It implies little flesh at the heels.
[5777]
Jurairi reported: I said to Abu Tufail: Did you see Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? He said: Yes, he had a white handsome face. Muslim b. Hajjaj said: Abu Tufail who died in 100 Hijra was the last of the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[5778]
Abu Tufail reported: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and there is one amongst the people of the earth who (are living at the present time and) had seen him except me. I said to him: How did you find him? He said: He had an elegant white color, and he was of an average height.
[5779]
Ibn Sirin reported: Anas b. Malik was asked whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) dyed his hair. He said: He had not become old enough to have white hair. Ibn Idris said that he had a few white hair. Abu Bakr and Umar, however, dyed hair with hina' (henna).
[5780]
Ibn Sirin reported: I asked Anas b. Malik whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) dyed his hair. He said: He had not reached the stage when (he needed) dyeing (of his white hair). He had a few white hair in his beard. I said to him: Did Abu Bakr dye his hair? He said: Yes, with hina' (henna).
[5781]
Muhammad b. Sirin reported: I asked Anas b. Malik whether Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) dyed his hair. He said: He had but little white hair.
[5782]
Thabit reported that Anas b. Malik was asked about the dyeing (of the hair of) Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). Thereupon he said.: (They were so few) that if I so liked I could count their number in his head, and he further said: (That is) he did not dye. Abu Bakr, however, dyed them and so did 'Umar dye them with pure henna.
[5783]
Anas b. Malik did not like that a person should pick out his white hair from his head or beard, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not dye, and there was some whiteness in his hair at his chin, on his temples and very little on his head. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Muthanna through the same chain of transmitters.
[5784]
Anas (b. Malik) was asked about the old age of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He said: Allah did not blemish him with white hair.
[5785]
Abu Juhaifa reported: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having some whiteness (in hair) at this place, and Zuhair placed one of his fingers at his chin. Juhaifa was asked how old he had been at that time. He said: I made arrows and put feathers to them (i.e. I had passed my childhood).
[5786]
Abu Juhaifa reported: I saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that he had white complexion and had some white hair, and Hasan b. 'Ali resembled him.
[5787]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Juhaifa with a slight variation of wording.
[5788]
Jabir b. Samura was asked about the old age of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He said: When he oiled his head nothing was seen (as a mark of old age) and when he did not apply oil something (of the old age) became visible.
[5789]
Jabir b. Samura reported that there had appeared some whiteness on the front part of the head and beard of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).When he applied oil, it did not become visible, but when he did not (apply) oil, it became apparent. And he had a thick beard. A person said: His face was as (bright) as the sword. Thereupon he (Jabir) said: No, it was round and like the sun and the moon. And I saw the seal near his shoulder of the size of a pigeon's egg and its color was the same as that of his body.
[5790]
Jabir. Samura reported: I saw the seal on his back as if it were a pigeon's egg.
[5791]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Simak with the same chain of transmitters.
[5792]
As-Sa'ib b. Yazid reported : My mother's sister took me to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, here is the son of my sister and he is ailing. He touched my head and invoked blessings upon me. He then performed ablution and I drank the water left from his ablution; then I stood behind him and I saw the seal between his shoulders.
[5793]
Abdullah b. Sarjis reported: I saw Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and ate with him bread and meat, or he said Tharid (bread soaked in soup). I said to him: Did Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) seek forgiveness for you ? He said : Yes, and for you, and he then recited this verse : "Ask forgiveness for thy sin and for the believing men and believing women" (xlvii. 19). I then went after him and saw the Seal of Prophethood between his shoulders on the left side of his shoulder having spots on it like moles.
[5794]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was neither very conspicuously tall nor short-statured, and his color was neither glaringly white nor brown; his hair was neither very curly nor very straight; Allah commissioned him (as a Prophet) when he had reached the age of forty years, and he stayed in Mecca for ten years and for ten years in Medina; Allah took him away when he had just reached the age of sixty, and there had not been twenty white hair in his head and beard.
[5795]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Anas b. Malik with this addition that instead of the word al-Amhaq there is the word Azhar.
[5796]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died when he was sixty-three years old, and so was the case with Abu Bakr, and so was the case with Umar who was also sixty-three (when he died).
[5797]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died when he had attained the age of sixty-three. And a hadith like this had been transmitted on the authority of Sa'id b. Musayyib.
[5798]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab through the same chain of transmitters.
[5799]
'Amr reported: I said to 'Urwa: How long did Allah's Apostle -(may peace be upon him) stay in Mecca? He said: For ten years. I said: Ibn 'Abbas says (that he stayed in Mecca) for thirteen years.
[5800]
'Amr reported: I said to 'Urwa: How long did Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) stay in Mecca? He said: For ten years. I said: Ibn Abbas says it is some years above ten. He ('Urwa) sought forgiveness for him and said : His statement is based on the verse of a poet.
[5801]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stayed in Mecca for thirteen years and he died when he had attained the age of sixty three years.
[5802]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stayed in Mecca for thirteen years (after he had received revelation) and stayed in Medina for ten years, and he was sixty-three when he died.
[5803]
Abu Ishaq reported: I was sitting with 'Abdullah b. 'Utba and there was a discussion about the age of the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Some of the persons said: Abu Bakr was older than Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). 'Abdullah said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died when he was sixty-three, and Abu Bakr died when he was sixty-three and so 'Umar fell as a martyr when he was sixty-three. A person from the people who was called 'Amir b. Sa'd reported that Jabir had said: We were sitting with Mu'awiya that there was a discussion about the age of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). Thereupon Mu'awiya said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died when he had attained the age of sixty-three, and Abu Bakr died when he had attained the age of sixty-three, and Umar fell as a martyr when he had attained the age of sixty-three.
[5804]
Jabir reported that he heard Mu'awiya say in his address that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died at the age of sixty-three, so was the case with Abu Bakr and 'Umar, and I (am now) sixty-three.
[5805]
'Ammar, the freed slave of Banu Hashim, reported: I asked Ibn 'Abbas how old was he when death overtook the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). He said: I little know that such a thing is not known to a man like you who belong to his people. He said: I asked people about it but they differed with me, and I liked to know your opinion about it. He said: Do you know counting? He said: Yes. He then said: Bear this in mind very well that he was commissioned (as a Prophet) at the age of forty, and he stayed in Mecca for fifteen years; sometime in peace and sometime in dread, and (lived) for ten years after his migration to Medina.
[5806]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yunus with the same chain of transmitters.
[5807]
Ammar, the freed slave of Banu Hashim, reported that Ibn 'Abbas said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) died when he had attained the age of sixty-five.
[5808]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Khalid with the same chain of transmitters.
[5809]
Ibn 'Abbas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stayed in Mecca for fifteen years (after his advent as a Prophet) and he heard the voice of Gabriel and saw his radiance for seven years but did not see any visible form, and then received revelation for ten years, and he stayed in Medina for ten years.
[5810]
Jubair b. Mut'im reported on the authority of his father that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I am Muhammad and I am Ahmad, and I am al-Mahi (the obliterator) by whom unbelief would be obliterated, and I am Hashir (the gatherer) at whose feet mankind will be gathered, and I am 'Aqib (the last to come) after whom there will be no Prophet.
[5811]
Jubair b. Mut'im reported on the authority of his father that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I have many names: I am Muhammad, I am Ahmad, I am al-Mahi through whom Allah obliterates unbelief, and I am Hashir (the gatherer) at whose feet people will be gathered, and I am 'Aqib (after whom there would be none), and Allah has named him as compassionate and merciful.
[5812]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ma'mar (and the words are): I said to Zuhri: What does (the word) al-'Aqib imply? He said: One after whom there is no Prophet, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Ma'mar and 'Uqail there is a slight variation of wording.
[5813]
Abu Musa Ash'ari reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) mentioned many names of his and said: I am Muhammad, Ahmad. Muqaffi (the last in succession), Hashir, the Prophet of repentance, and the Prophet of Mercy.
[5814]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did an act, and held it to be valid. This news reached some persons amongst his Companions (and it was felt) that they did not approve of it and avoided (it). This reaction of theirs was conveyed to him. He stood to deliver an address; and said: What has happened to the people to whom there was conveyed on my behalf a matter for which I granted permission and they disapproved it and avoided it? By Allah, I have the best knowledge of Allah amongst them, and I fear Him most amongst them.
[5815]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of A'mash through a different chain of transmitters.
[5816]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) granted permission for doing a thing, but some persons amongst the people avoided it. This was conveyed to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and he was so much annoyed that the sign of his anger appeared on his face. He then said: What has happened to the people that they avoid that for which permission has been granted to me? By Allah, I have the best knowledge of Allah amongst them, and fear Him most amongst them.
[5817]
'Urwa b. Zubair reported that 'Abdullah b. Zubair had narrated to him that a person from the Ansar disputed with Zubair in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in regard to the watering places of Harra from which they watered the date-palms. The Ansari said: Let the water flow, but he (Zubair) refused to do this and the dispute was brought to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he said to Zubair: Zubair, water (your date-palms), then let the water flow to your neighbor. The Ansari was enraged and said: Allah's Messenger, (you have given this decision) for he is the son of your father's sister. The face of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) underwent a change, and then said: Zubair, water (your date-palms), then hold it until it rises up to the walls. Zubair said: I think, by Allah, that this verse: "Nay, by the Lord, they will not (really) (believe) until they make thee a judge of what is in dispute among them, and find in this no dislike of what thou decidest and submit with full submission" (iv. 65).
[5818]
Abu Huraira reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Avoid that which I forbid you to do and do that which I command you to do to the best of your capacity. Verily the people before you went to their doom because they had put too many questions to their Prophets and then disagreed with their teachings.
[5819]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters.
[5820]
This hadith has been narrated by Abu Huraira through a different chain of transmitters (and the words are) that he reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: Abandon that which I have asked you to abandon, for the people before you went to their doom (for asking too many questions).
[5821]
Amir b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The greatest sinner amongst the Muslims is one who asked about a thing (from Allah's Apostle) which had not been forbidden for the Muslims and it was forbidden for them because of his persistently asking about it.
[5822]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of 'Amir b. Sa'd and the words are. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The greatest sinner of the Muslims amongst Muslims is one who asked about a certain thing which had not been prohibited and it was prohibited because of his asking about it. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters and with this addition: "A person asked about a thing from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he indulged in hair-splitting."
[5823]
Anas b. Malik reported that something was conveyed to him (the Holy prophet) about his Companions, so he addressed them and said: Paradise and Hell were presented to me and I have never seen the good and evil as (I did) today. And if you were to know you would have wept more and laughed less. He (the narrator) said: There was nothing more burdensome for the Companions of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) than this. They covered their heads and the sound of weeping was heard from them. Then there stood up 'Umar and he said: We are well pleased with Allah as our Lord, with Islam as our code of life and with Muhammad as our Apostle, and it was at that time that a person stood up and he said: Who is my father? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Your father is so and so; and there was revealed the verse: "O you who believe, do not ask about matters which, if they were to be made manifest to you (in terms of law), might cause to you harm"(v. 101).
[5824]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person said: Allah's Messenger, who is my father? And he said: Your father is so and so, and there was revealed this verse: "Do not ask about matters which, if they were to be made manifest to you, might cause you harm" (v. 101).
[5825]
Anas b. Malik reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him stood when the sun had passed the meridian and he led them noon prayer and after observing salutations (completing the prayer) he stood upon the pulpit and talked about the Last Hour and made a mention of the important facts prior to it and then said: He who desires to ask anything from me let him ask me about it. By Allah, I shall not move from this place so long as I do not inform you about that which you ask. Anas b. Malik said: People began to shed tears profusely when they heard this from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said it repeatedly: You ask me. Thereupon 'Abdullah b. Hudhafa stood up and said: Allah's Messenger, who is my father? He said: Your father is Hudhafa, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said repeatedly: Ask me, and (it was at this juncture that 'Umar knelt down and said): We are well pleased with Allah as our Lord, with Islam as our code of life and with Muhammad as the Messenger (of Allah). Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) kept quiet so long as 'Umar spoke. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: (The Doom) is near; by Him, in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, there was presented to me the Paradise and Hell in the nook of this enclosure, and I did not see good and evil like that of the present day. Ibn Shihab reported: Ubaidullah b. 'Abdullah b. 'Utba told me that the mother of 'Abdullah b. Hudhafa told 'Abdullah b. Hudhafa: I have never heard of a son more disobedient than you. Do you feel yourself immune from the fact that your mother committed a sin which the women in the pre-Islamic period committed and then you disgrace her in the eyes of the people? 'Abdullah b. Hudhafa said: If my fatherhood were to be attributed to a black slave I would have connected myself with him.
[5826]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Zuhri with a slight variation of wording.
[5827]
Anas b. Malik reported that the people asked Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) until he was hard pressed. He went out one day and he occupied the pulpit and said: Ask me and I shall leave no question of yours unanswered for you, and when the people heard about it they were overawed, as if (something tragic) was going to happen. Anas said: I began to look towards the right and the left and (found) that every person was weeping wrapping his head with the cloth. Then a person in the mosque broke the ice and they used to dispute with him by attributing his fatherhood to another man than his own father. He said: Allah's Apostle, who is my father? He said: Your father is Hudhafa. Then 'Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with him) dared say something and said: We are well pleased with Allah as our Lord, with Islam as our code of life and with Muhammad as our Messenger, seeking refuge with Allah from the evil of Turmoil. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Never did I see the good and evil as today. Paradise and Hell were given a visible shape before me (in this worldly life) and I saw both of them near this well.
[5828]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Qatada.
[5829]
Abu Musa reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) was asked such things which he disapproved and when they persisted on asking him he felt enraged and then said to the people: Ask me what you wish to ask. Thereupon a person said: Who is my father? He said: Your father is Hudhafa. Then another person stood up and said: Allah's Messenger, who is my father? He said: Your father is Salim, the freed slave of Shaiba. When 'Umar saw the signs of anger upon the face of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), he said: Allah's Messenger, we ask repentance from Allah. And in the hadith transmitted on the authority of Abu Kuraib (the words are): "Allah's Messenger, who is my father? He said: Your father is Salim, the freed slave of Shaiba."
[5830]
Musa b. Talha reported: I and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by people near the date-palm trees. He (the Holy Prophet) said: What are these people doing? They said: They are grafting, i.e. they combine the male with the female (tree) and thus they yield more fruit. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I do not find it to be of any use. The people were informed about it and they abandoned this practice. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) (was later) on informed (that the yield had dwindled), whereupon he said: If there is any use of it, then they should do it, for it was just a personal opinion of mine, and do not go after my personal opinion; but when I say to you anything on behalf of Allah, then do accept it, for I do not attribute lie to Allah, the Exalted and Glorious.
[5831]
Rafi' b. Khadij reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to Medina and the people had been grafting the trees. He said: What are you doing? They said: We are grafting them, whereupon he said: It may perhaps be good for you if you do not do that, so they abandoned this practice (and the date-palms) began to yield less fruit. They made a mention of it (to the Holy Prophet), whereupon he said: I am a human being, so when I command you about a thing pertaining to religion, do accept it, and when I command you about a thing out of my personal opinion, keep it in mind that I am a human being. 'Ikrima reported that he said something like this.
[5832]
Anas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) happened to pass by the people who had been busy in grafting the trees. Thereupon he said: If you were not to do it, it might be good for you. (So they abandoned this practice) and there was a decline in the yield. He (the Holy Prophet) happened to pass by them (and said): What has gone wrong with your trees? They said: You said so and so. Thereupon he said: You have better knowledge (of a technical skill) in the affairs of the world.
[5833]
Abu Huraira reported so many 'ahadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and one among them was that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said: By Him in Whose Hand is the life of Muhammad, a day would come to you when you would not be able to see me, and the glimpse of my face would be dearer to one than one's own family, one's property and in fact everything. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ishaq with a slight variation of wording.
[5834]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I am most akin to the son of Mary among the whole of mankind and the Prophets are of different mothers, but of one religion, and no Prophet was raised between me and him (Jesus Christ).
[5835]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I am most akin to Jesus Christ among the whole of mankind, and all the Prophets are of different mothers but belong to one religion and no Prophet was raised between me and Jesus.
[5836]
Abu Huraira reported many ahadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and one is that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I am most close to Jesus, son of Mary, among the whole of mankind in this worldly life and the next life. They said: Allah's Messenger how is it? Thereupon he said: Prophets are brothers in faith, having different mothers. Their religion is, however, one and there is no Apostle between us (between I and Jesus Christ).
[5837]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: No child is born but he is pricked by the satan and he begins to weep because of the pricking of the satan except the son of Mary and his mother. Abu Huraira then said: You may recite if you so like (the verse): "I seek Thy protection for her and her offspring against satan the accursed" (iii. 36). This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters (and the words are): "The newborn child is touched by the satan (when he comes in the world) and he starts crying because of the touch of satan." In the hadith transmitted on the authority of Shu'aib there is a slight variation of wording.
[5838]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The satan touches every son of Adam on the day when his mother gives birth to him with the exception of Mary and her son.
[5839]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The crying of the child (starts) when the satan begins to prick him.
[5840]
Abu Huraira reported ahadith from the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him) (and one of them was) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said Jesus son of Mary saw a person committing theft; thereupon Jesus said to him: You committed theft. He said: Nay. By Him besides Whom there is no god (I have not committed theft). Thereupon Jesus said: I affirm my faith in Allah It is my ownself that deceived me.
[5841]
Anas b. Malik reported that a person came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: O, the best of creation ; thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He is Ibrahim (peace be upon him).
[5842]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas through a different chain of transmitters.
[5843]
Anas reported a hadith like this from Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) through another chain of transmitters.
[5844]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said that Ibrahim circumcised himself with the help of adz when he was eiclhty years old.
[5845]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: We have more claim to doubt than Ibrahim (peace be upon him) when he said , My Lord, show me how thou wilt quicken the dead. He said : Believeth thou not? He said: Yes, but that my heart rest at ease (the Holy Qur'an.260). May Lord have mercy on Lot that he wanted a strong support and had I stayed in the prison as long as Yusuf stayed I would have responded to him who invited me.
[5846]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri through another chain of transmitters.
[5847]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters but with a slight variation of wording.
[5848]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying Prophet Ibrahim (peace be upon him) never told a lie but only thrice: two times for the sake of Allah (for example, his words) : "I am sick," and his words: "But it was the big one amongst them which has done that" and because of Sara (his wife). He had come in a land inhabited by haughty and cruel men along with Sara. She was very good-looking amongst the people, so he said to her: If these were to know that you are my wife they would snatch you away from me, so if they ask you tell that you are my sister and in fact you are my sister in Islam, and I do not know of any other Muslim in this land besides I and you. And when they entered that land the tyrants came to see her and said to him (the king): 'there comes to your land a woman, whom you alone deserve to possess, so he (the kings sent someone (towards her) and she was brought and Ibrahim (peace be upon him) stood in preyer, and when she visited him (the tyrant king came) he could help but stretch his hand towards her and his hand was tied up. He said: Supplicate Allah so that He may release my hand and I will do no harm to you. She did that and the man repeated (the same highhandedness) and his hand was again tied up more tightly than on the first occasion and he said to her like that and she again did that (supplicated), but he repeated (the same highhandedness and his hands were tied up more tightly than on the previous occasion). He then again said: Supplicate your Lord so that He may set my hand free; by .@ llah I shall do no harm to you. She did and his hand was freed. Then he called the person who had brought her and said to him: You have brought to me the satan and you have not brought to me a human being, so turn them out from my land, and he gave Hajira as a gift to her. She returned (along with Hajira) and when Ibrahim (peace be upon him) saw her, he said: How have you returned ? She said : With full safety (have I returned). Allah held the hand of that debauch and he gave me a maid-servant. Abu Hiaraira said: O sons of the rain of the sky, she is your mother.
[5849]
Hammam b. Munabbih reported that Abu Huraira reported many ahadith from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and one, of them speaks that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said: Banu Isra'il used to take bath (together) naked and thus saw private parts of one another, but Moses (peace be upon him) used to take bath alone (in privacy), and they said: By Allah, nothing prevents Moses to take bath along with us; but scrotal hernia. One day when he (Moses) was taking bath (alone) he placed his clothes upon a stone, but the stone began to move along with his clothes. Moses raced after it saying: My garment, stone ; until (some of the people) of Banu Isra'il looked at the private parts of Moses, and they said: By Allah, there is no trouble with Moses. The stone stopped after he (Moses) had been seen. He took hold of his garments and struck the stone. Abu Huraira said: I swear by Allah that there were six or seven scars on the stone because of the striking of stone by Moses (peace be upon him).
[5850]
Abu Huraira reported that Moses was a modest person. He was never seen naked and Banu Isra'iI said: (He was afraid to expose his private part) because he had been suffering from scrotal hernia. He (one day) took bath in water and placed his garments upon a stone. The stone began to move on quickly. He followed that and struck it with the help of a stone (saying): O stone, my garment; O stone, my garments, O stone; until it stopped near the big gathering of Isrii'll, and this verse was revealed (pertaining to the incident): "O you who believe, be not Iike those who maligned Moses, but Allah cleared him of what they said, and he was worthy of regard with Allah" (xxxiii. 69).
[5851]
Abu Huraira reported that the Angel of Death was sent to Moses (peace be upon him) to inform of his Lord's summons. When he came, he (Moses) boxed him and his eye was knocked out. He (the Angel of Death) came back to the Lord and said: You sent me to a servant. who did not want to die. Allah restored his eye to its proper place (and revived his eyesight), and then said: Go back to him and tell him that if he wants life he must place his hand on the back of an ox, and he would be granted as many years of life as the number of hair covered by his hand. He (Moses) said: My Lord what would happen then He said: Then you must court death. He said: Let it be now. And he supplicated Allah to bring him close to the sacred land . Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: If I were there, I would have shown you his grave beside the road at the red mound.
[5852]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said that the Angel of Death came to Moses and said: Respond (to the call) of Allah (i.e. be prepared for death). Moses (peace be upon him) gave a blow at the eye of the Angel of Death and knocked it out. The Angel went back to Allah (the Exalted) and said: You sent me to your servant who does not like to die and he knocked out my eye. Allah restored his eye to its proper place (and revived his eyesight) and said: Go to My servant and say: Do you want life? And in case you want life, keep your hand on the body of the ox and you would live such number of years as the (number of) hair your hand covers. He (Moses) said: What, then? He said: Then you would die, whereupon he (Moses) said: Then why not now? (He then prayed): Allah, cause me to die close to the sacred land. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Had I been near that place I would have shown his grave by the side of the path at the red mound. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ma'mar.
[5853]
Abu Huraira reported: While a Jew was selling goods, he was given something which he did not accept or he did not agree (to accept) that 'Abdul 'Azlz (one of the narrators) is doubtful about it. He (the Jew) said: By Allah, Who chose Moses (peace be upon him) among mankind. A person from the Ansar heard it and gave a blow at his face saying: (You have the audacity) to say: By Him Who chose Moses amongst mankind, whereas Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is living amongst us. The Jew went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Abu'l-Qasim, I am a Dhimmi and (thus need your protection) by a covenant, and added: Such and such person has given a blow upon my face. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Why did you give a blow on his face? He said: Allah's Messenger, this man said: By Him Who chose Moses (peace be upon him) amongst mankind, whereas you are living amongst us. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) became angry and signs of anger could be seen on his face, and then said: Don't make distinction amongst the Prophets of Allah. When the horn will be blown and whatever is in the heavens and the earth would swoon but he whom Allah grants exception, then another horn will be blown and I would be the first amongst those who would recover and Moses (peace be upon him) would be catching hold of the Throne and I do not know whether it is a compensation for that when he swooned on the Day of Tur or he would be resurrected before me and I do not say that anyone is more excellent than Yunus son of Matta (peace he upon him). This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Salama with the same chain of transmitters.
[5854]
Abu Fluraira reported that two persons, one from amongst the Jews and the other from amongst the Muslims, fell into dispute and began to abuse one another. The Muslim said: By Him Who chose Muhammad (may peace be upon him) in the worlds. And the Jew said: By Him Who chose Moses in the worlds. Thereupon the Muslim lifted his hand and slapped at the face of the Jew. The Jew went to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and told him about his affair and the affair of the Muslim. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) laid:Don't make me superior to Moses for mankind will swoon and I would be the 'first to recover from it and Moses would be at that time seizing the side of the Throne and I do not know (whether) he would swoon and would recover before me or Allah would make an exception for him.
[5855]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person from amongst the Muslims and a person from amongst the Jews fell into dispute and reviled each other. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[5856]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported that a Jew who had received a blow at his face came to Allali',; Messenger (may peace be upon him) ; the rest of the hadith is the same, up to the hand (where the words are): That he (the Holy Prophet) said: I do not know whether he would be one who would fall into swoon and would recover before me or he would be compensated for his swooning at Tur (and thus he would not swoon on this occasion) of Resurrection.
[5857]
Abu Sa'id Kudari reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having, said this: Don't make distinction amongst the Apostles. This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters also.
[5858]
Anas b. malik reported Allah's Messenger(may peace be upon him)as saying: I came. And in the narration transmitted on the authority of Haddib (the words are): I happened to pass by Moses on the occasion of the Night journey near the red mound (and found him) saying his prayer in his grave.
[5859]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I happened to pass by Moses as he was busy in saying prayer in his grave, and in the hadith transmitted on the authority of 'Isa there is an addition of these words: ,I happened to pass on the occasion of the Night journey." In the hadith pertaining to Yunus (peace be upon him) the words of the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) are: "It is not meet for a, servant that he should say: "I am better than Yunus (jonah) son of Matta. "
[5860]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may prace be upon him) as saying that Allah, the Exalted and Majestic, said: It is not meet for a servant of Mine that he should say: I am better than Yunus b. Matta (peace be upon him).
[5861]
Abu al-Aliya said: The son of the uncle of your Prophet (may peace be upon him), i.e. Ibn Abbas, reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: It is not meet for a servant that he should say: I am better than Yunus b. Matta (and this Matta) is the name of his father.
[5862]
Abu Huraira reported: It was said to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as to who was the most worthy of respect amongst people. He said: The most God-conscious amongst you They said: It is not this that we are asking about, whereupon he said: Then he is Yusuf, the Apostle of Aliah and the son of Allah's Apostle, Ya'qub, who was also the son of Allah's Apostle, the friend of Allah (Ibrahim) They said: This is not what we are asking you. He said: You mean the tribes of Arabia? Those who are good in pre-Islamic days are good in Islam (after embracing Islam) when they get an understanding of it.
[5863]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Zakariyya (peace be upon him) was a carpenter.
[5864]
Sa'id b. jubair reported: I said to Ibn Abbas that Nauf al-Bikali was of the opinion that Moses (peace be upon him), the Apostle of Bani Isra'il, was not the same who accompanied Khadir, whereupon he said: The enemy of Allah tells a lie. I heard Ubayy b. Ka'b say: Moses (peace be upon him) stood up to give sermon to the people of Isra'i1. He was asked as to who amongst the people has the best knowledge, whereupon he said: I have the best knowledge. Thereupon Allah was annoyed with him that he did not attribute (the best knowledge) to Him. He revealed to him: A servant amongst My servants is at the junction of two rivers who has more knowledge than yours. Moses said: How can I meet him? It was said to him: Carry a fish in the large basket and the place where you find it missing there you will find him. Thereupon Moses proceeded forth along with a young man (Yusha'). Joshua b. Nan and Moses (peace be upon him) put the fish in the basket and there went along with him the young man (Yusha') until they came to a certain rock and Moses and his companion went to sleep and the fish stirred in that basket and fell into the ocean and Allah stopped the current of water like a vault until the way was made for the fish. Moses and his youn. companion were astonished and they walked for the rest of the day and the night and the friend of Moses forgot to inform him of this incident. When it was morning, Moses (peace be upon him) said to the young man: Bring for us the breakfast for we are dead tired because of this journey, and they did not feel exhausted until they had passed that place where they had been commanded (to stay). He said: Don't you know that when we reached the Sakhra (rock) I forgot the fisii and noth ng made me forget it but the satan that I. could nit remember it? How strange is it that the fish found a way in the river? Moses said: That was what we had been aiming at. Then both of them retraced their steps until they reached Sakhra; there they saw a man covered with a cloth. Moses greeted him. Khadir said to him: Where is as-Salam in our country.? He said: I am Moses, whereupon he (Khadir) said: You mean the Moses of Bani Isra'il? He said: Yes. He (Khadir) said: You have a knowledge out of the knowledge of Allah which in fact Allah imparted to you and about that I know nothing and I have knowledge out of Allah's knowledge which He imparted to me and about that you do not know. Moses (peace be upon him) said to him: May I follow you so that you may teach me that with which you have been taught righteousness. He said: You will not be able to bear with me; how you will be able to bear that about which you do not know? Moses said: Thou wilt find me patient, nor shalt I disobey you in aught. Khadir said to him: If you were to follow me, then do not ask me about anything until I myself speak to you about it. He said: Yes. So Khadir and Moses set forth on the bank of the river that there came before them a boat. Both of theni talked to them (the owners of the boat) so that they might carry both of them.They had recognised Khadir and they carried them free. Khadir thereupon took hold of a plank in the boat and broke it away. Moses said: These people have carried us without any charge and you attempt to break their boat so that the people sailing in the boat may drown. This is (something) grievous that you have done. He said: Did I not say that you would not bear with me? He said: Blame me not for what I forgot and be not hard upon what I did. Then both of them got down from the boat and began to walk along the coastline that they saw a boy who had been playing with other boys. Khadir pulled up his head and killed him. Moses said: Have you killed an innocent person who is in no way guilty of slaying another? You have done something horrible. Thereupon he said : Did I not say to you that you will not be able to bear with me? He (Moses) said: This (act) is more grievous than the first one. He (Moses) further said. If I ask you about anything after this, keep not company with me, then you would no doubt find (a plausible) excuse for this. Then they both walked on until they reached the inhabitants of a village. They asked its inhabitants for food but they refused to entertain them as their guests. They found in it a wall which had been bent on one side and was about to fall. Khadir set it right with his own hand. Moses,said to him: It is the people to whom we came but they showed us no hospitality and they did not serve us food. If you wish you can get wages for it. He (Khadir) said: This is the parting of ways between mt and you. Now I wish to reveal to you the significance of that for which you could not bear with me. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said . May Allah have mercy upon Moses ! I wish if Moses could show patience and a (fuller) story of both of them could have been told. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said that the first thing which Moses said was out of forgetfulness. Then there came a sparrow until it perched on the wall of the boat and took water from the ocean. Thereupon, Khadir said: My knowledge and your knowledge in comparison with the knowledge of Allah is even less than the water taken by the sparrow in its beak in comparison to the water of the ocean, and Sa'id b. jubair used to recite (verses 79 and 80 of Sura Kahf) in this way: There was before them a king who used to seize every boat by force which was in order, the boy was an unbeliever.
[5865]
Sa,id b. jubair reported that it was said to Ibn 'Abbas that Nauf al-Bikali was of the opinion that Moses who went in search of knowledge was not the Moses of Bani Isra'il. He said: Sa'id, did you hear it from him? I said: Yes. Thereupon he said that Nauf had not stated the fact. Ubayy b. Ka'b narrated to us that he had heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Moses had been delivering sermons to his people. And he made this remark: No person upon the earth has better knowledge than I or nothing better than mine. Thereupon Allah revealed to him: I know one who is better than you (in knowledge) or there is a person on the earth having more knowledge than you. Thereupon he said: My Lord, direct me to him. It was said to him: Keep a salted fish as a provision for journey. The place where that fish would be lost (there you will find that man). So he set forth and a young slave along with him until they came to a place Sakhra. but he did not find any clue. So he proceeded on and left that young man there. The fish began to stir in water and the water assumed the form of an ark over the fish. The young man said: I should meet Allah's Apostle (peace be upon him) and inform him, but he was made to forget and when they had gone beyond that place, he (Moses) said to the young man: Bring breakfast. We have been exhausted because of the journey, and he (Moses) was not exhausted until he had crossed that (particular) place (where he had) to meet Khadir, and the youth was reminded and said: Did you not see that as we reached Sakhra I forgot the fish and it is satan alone who has made me forgetful of it'? It is strange that he has been able to find way in the ocean too. He said: This is what we sought for us. They returned retracing their steps, and he (his companion) pointed to him the location (where) the fish (had been lost). Moses began to search him there. He suddenly saw Khadir wrapped in a cloth and lying on his back. He said to him: As-Salamu-'Alaikum. He removed the cloth from his face and said: Wa 'Alaikum-us-Salam! Who are you? He said: I am Moses. He said: Who Moses? He said: Moses Of Bani Isra'il. He said: What brought you here? He said: I have come so that you may teach me what you have been taught of righteousness. He said: You shall have to bear with me, and how can you have patience about a thing of which you have no comprehensive knowledge? You will not have patience when you see me doing a thing I have been ordered to do. He said: If Allah pleases, you will find me patient, nor shall I disobey you in aught. Khadir said: If you follow me, don't ask me about anything until I explain it to you. So they went on until they embarked upon a boat. He (Khadir) made a hole in that. Thereupon he (Moses) said: You have done this so that you may drown the persons sitting in the boat. You have done something grievous. Thereupon he said: Did I not tell you that you will not be able to bear with me? Thereupon he (Moses) said: Blame me not for what I forgot and be not hard upon me for what I did. (Khadir gave him another chance.) So they went on until they reached a place where boys were playing. He went to one of them and caught hold'of one (apparently) at random and killed him. Moses (peace be upon him) felt agitated and said: You have killed an innocent person not guilty of slaying another. You have done something aboininable. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: May Allah have mercy upon us and Moses. Had he shown patience he would have seen wonderful things, but fear of blame, with respect to his companion, seized him and he said: If I ask anything after this, keep not company with me. You will then have a valid excuse in my case, and had he (Moses) shown patience he would have seen many wonderful things. He (the narrator) said: Whenever he (the Holy Prophet) made mention of any Prophet, he always said : May there be mercy of Allah upon us and upon my brother so and so. They, however, proceeded on until they came to the inhabitants of a village who were very miserly. They went to the meeting places and asked for hospitality but they refused to show any hospitality to them. They both found in that village a wall which was about to fall. He (Khadir) set it right. Thereupon he (Moses) said: If you so liked. you could get wages for it. Thereupon he said: This is the partince, of ways between me and you, and, taking hold of his cloth, he said: Now I will explain to you the real significance (of all these acts) for which you could not show patience. As for the boat, it belonged to the poor people working on the river and I intended to damage it for there was ahead of them (a king) who seized boats by force. (When he came) to catch hold of it he found it a damaged boat, so he spared it (and later on) it was set right with wood. So far as the boy is concerned, he has been, by very nature, an unbeliever, whereas his parents loved him very much. Had he grown up he would have involved them in wrongdoing and unbelief, so we wished that their Lord should give them in its place one better in purity and close to mercy. And as for the wall it belonged to two orphan boys in the city and there was beneath it a (treasure) belongin to them, ...up to the last verse. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Ishaq.
[5866]
Ibn 'Abbas has reported this hadith on the authority of Ubayy b. ka'b that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) used to recite this.
[5867]
'Utba b. Mas,ud reported that 'Abdullah b. 'Abbas contended with Hurr b.Qais b. Hisn al-Fazari aboat the companion of Moses (peace be upon hiin). Ibn 'Abbas said that he was Khadir. There happened to pass Ubayy b. Ka'b Ansari. Ibn Abbas called him and said: Abu Tufail, come to us. There has been a difference of opinion between me and my friend about the companion of Moses whom he wanted to meet on the way.Did hear anything from Allah's meesenger (may peace be upon him) making a mention of anything? Ubayy said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may Peace be upon him) as saying: As Moses was amongst the group of Bani Isra'il, there came to him a person and he said to him: Do you know anyone having better knowledge than you? Moses said: No. Thereupon Allah revealed to Moses: Of course, there is amongst Our servants Khadir (who has better knowledge) than you. Moses asked the way of meeting him. Allah made the fish a sign and it was said to him: Where you miss the fish return to that (place) and you will soon find him. So Moses moved on as Allah wished him to move on. He then said to his young companion: Bring for us the breakfast. Thereupop that young man said to Moses. when he asked him for the breakfast: Don't you see that as we had reached the Sakhra I forgot the fish and nobody made it forget (in our mind) but the satan that I should remind you of it? Mosed said to that young man: This was what we wanted. So they retraced their steps and met Khadir and the events which followed have been described in His Book except that Yunus (the narrator) said that he followed the traces of fish in the ocean.
[5868]
Anas b. Malik reported that Abu Bakr Siddiq reported him thus: I saw the feet of the polytheists very close to us as we were in the cave. I said: Allah's Messenger, if one amongst them were to see at his feet he would have surely seen us. Thereupon he said: Abu Bakr, what can befall twain who have Allah as the third One with them.
[5869]
Abu Sa'id reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sat on the pulpit and said: Allah gave a choice to His servant that he may opt the beauties of the world or that which is with Him and the servant chose that which was with Him. Thereupon Abu Bakr wept and he wept bitterly and said: Let our fathers and our mothers be taken as ransom for you. It was Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) who had been given the choice and Abu Bakr knew it better than us, and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said: Behold, of all people the most generous toward me in regard to his companionship and his property was Abu Bakr and were I to choose anyone as my bosom friend, I would have chosen Abu Bakr as my dear friend, but (for him) I cherish Islamic brotherliness and love. There shall be left open no window in the mosque except Abu Bakr's window.
[5870]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Sa'id Khudri through another chain of transmitters.
[5871]
'Abdullah b. Mas'ud reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If I were to choose a bosom friend I would have definitely chosen Abu Bakr as my bosom friend, but he is my brother and my companion and Allah, the Exalted and Gliorious. has taken your brother and companion (meaning Prophet himself) as a friend.
[5872]
Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If I were to choose from my Umma anyone as my bosom friend, I would have chosen Abu Bakr.
[5873]
'Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If I were to choose as my bosom friend I would have chosen the son of Abu Quhafa (Abu Bakr) as my bosom friend.
[5874]
Abdullah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: If I were to choose amongst the people of earth someone as my bosom friend, I would have chosen the son of Abu Quhafa as my friends but God has taken your companion as a friend.
[5875]
This hadith has been narrated through another chain of transmitters and the one narrated on the authority of Abdullah (the words are): "Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) is reported to have said: Behold I am free from the dependence of all bosom friends and if I were to choose anyone as bosom friend I would have taken Abu Bakr as my bosom friend. Allah has taken your companion as a friend.
[5876]
'Amr b. al-'As reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent him in command of the army despatched to Dhat-as-Salasil. When 'Amr b. al-'As came back to the Holy Prophet (may peace be upon him) he said: Who amongst people are dearest to you? He said: A'isha. He then said: Who amongst men? He said: Her father, and I said: And who next? He said: Umar. He then enumerated some other men.
[5877]
Ibn Abu Mulaika reported: I heard A'isha as saying and she was asked as to whom Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) would have nominated his successor if he had to nominate one at all. She said: Abu Bakr. It was said to her: Then whom after Abu Bakr? She said: Umar. It was said to her. Then whom after 'Umar ? She said: Abu Ubaida b. Jarrab, and then she kept quiet at this.
[5878]
Muhammad b. Jubair b. Mut'im reported on the authority of his father that a woman asked Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) about something but lit, told her to come to him on some other occasion, whereupon she said: What in your opinion (should I do) if I come to you but do not find you, and it seemed as if she meant that he might die. Thereupon he said: If you do not find me, then come to Abu Bakr.
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jubair b. Mut'im through another chain of transmitters (and the words are) that a woman came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and discussed with him something and he gave a command as we find in the above-mentioned narration.
[5879]
A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in his (last) illness asked me to call Abu Bakr, her father, and her brother too, so that he might write a document, for he feared that someone else might be desirous (of succeeding him) and that some claimant may say: I have better claim to it, whereas Allah and the Faithful do not substantiate the claim of anyone but that of Abu Bakr.
[5880]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Who amongst you is observing fastthis day? Abu Bake said: It is I. He (again) said: Who amongst you has followed the bier today? Abu Bakr said: It is I. He (the Holy Prophet) again said: Who amongst you has served food to the needy? Abu Bakr said: It is I. He (again) said: Who amongst you has today visited the sick? Abu Bakr said: It is I. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: He must get into Paradise who combines in himself (all these noble qualities and virtues).
[5881]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A person had been driving an ox loaded with luggage. The ox looked towards him and said: I have not been created for this but for lands (i.e. for ploughing the land and for drawing out water from the wells for the purpose of irrigating the lands). The people said with surprise and awe: Hallowed be Allah, does the ox speak? Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I believe it and so do Abu Bakr and 'Umar. Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: A shepherd was tendirig the flock when a wolf came there and took away one goat. Tile shepherd pursued it (the wolf) and rescued it (the goat) from that (wolf). The wolf looked towards him and said: Who would save it on the day when there will be no shepherd except me ? Thereupon people said: Hallowed be Allah I Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I believe in it and so do Abu Bakr and Umar believe.
[5882]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters, but there is no mention of the story pertaining to the ox.
[5883]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Zuhri, and there is a clear mention of the stories of ox and goat (and the words are): I believe in it and so do Abu Bakr and Umar, but they were not at that time present there.
[5884]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transrritters.
[5885]
Ibn Abu Mulaika reported: I heard Ibn 'Abbas as saying: Wlien 'Umar b. Khatab was placed in the coffin the people gathered around him. They praised him and supplicated for him before the bier was lifted up, and I was one amongst them. Nothing attracted my attention but a person who gripped my shoulder from behind. I saw towards him and found that he was 'All. He invoked Allah's mercy upon 'Umar and said: You have left none behind you (whose) deeds (are so enviable) that I love to meet Allah with them. By Allah, I hoped that Allah would keep you and your two associates together. I had often heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I came and there came too Abu Bakr and 'Umar; I entered and there entered too Abu Bakr and 'Umar; I went out and there went out too Abu Bakr and 'Umar, and I hope and think that Allah will keep you along with them.
[5886]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Umar b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[5887]
Abu Sa'id Khudri reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as say ing: While I was asleep I saw people being presented to me (in a dream) and they wore shirts and some of these reached up to the breasts and some even beyond them. Then there happened to pass 'Umar b. Khattab and his shirt had been trailing. They said: Allah's Messeneer, how do you interpret the dream ? He said: (As strength of) faith.
[5888]
Hamza b. Abdullah b. 'Umar b. Khattab reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: While I was asleep I saw (in a dream) a cup containing milk bein. presented to me. I took out of that until I perceived freshness being reflected through my nails. Then I presented the leftover to 'Umar b. Khattab. They said: Allah's Messenger: Fow do you interpret it? He said: This implies knowledge.
[5889]
This hadith has beer. narrated on the authority of Yunus with the same chain of transmitters.
[5890]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: While I was asleep I saw myself on a well with a leathern bucket on a pulley. I drew (water) out of that as Allah wished me (to draw). Then the son of Abu Quhafa (Abu Bakr) drew from it one bucketful or two and there was some weakness in drawing that (may Allah forgive him). Then that bucket (changed into a large bucket) and Ibn Khattab drew it. I did not see any strongest man drawing it like 'Umar b. Khattab. He brought out so much water that the camels of the people had enough to drink and then laid down (for rest).
[5891]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yunus through another chain of transmitters.
[5892]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I saw Ibn Abu Quhafa drawing (water); the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5893]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: While I was asleep I saw myself drawing water from my tank in order to quench the thirst of the people that there came to me Abu Bakr. He took hold of the leathern bucket from my hand so that he should serve water to the people. He drew two bucketfuls and there was some weakness in his drawing (Allah may forgive him). Then there came Ibn Khattab and he took hold of that, and I did not see a person stronger than he (drawing water) until the people went away with their thirst quenched and the tank filled with water.
[5894]
Abdullah b. 'Umar reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I saw (in a dream) as if I was drawing water with a leathern bucket on a wooden pulley. There came Abu Bakr and he drew out a bucketful or two and as he drew out, some weakness (was perceived in it) (may Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, forgive him). Then Umar came in order to serve water -and the bucket was changed into a large leather bucket and I did not see such a wonderful man amongst persons (drawing water) and he went on serving water to the people until they were fully satisfied and then went to their resting places.
[5895]
Salim b. 'Abdullah reported on the authority of his father some of the dreams of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) pertaining to Abu Bakr and Umar b. Khattab (Allah be pleased with them) and a hadith like this.
[5896]
Jabir reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: I entered Paradise and saw in it a house or a palace. I said: For whom is it resersred? They (the Angels) said: It is for 'Umar b. Khattab. (The Holy Prophet said to 'Umar b. Khattab): I intenied to get into it but I thought of your feelings. Thereupon 'Umar wept and said: Apostle of Allah, could I feel any jealousy in your case?
[5897]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Jabir through another chain of transmitters.
[5898]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Wtiile'l was asleep I saw myself in Paradise and a woman performing ablution by the side of a palace. I said: For whom is it meant? They said: It is meant for 'Umar b. Khattab. (The Holy Prophet) said: There came across my mind the feeling of Umar and so I turned back and went away. Abu Huraira said: 'Umar wept as we were present in that meeting with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) amongst us and Umar said: Allah's Messenger, may my father and mother be taken as ransom for you. Could I at all feel any jealousy about you? This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Ibn Shihab with the same chain of transmitters.
[5899]
Sa'd b. Waqqas reported that Umar sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to visit him when some women of the Quraish were busy in talking with him and raising their voices above his Voiee. When'Umar sought permission they stood up and went hurriedly behind the curtain. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gave him permission smilingly. Thereupon 'Umar said: Allah's Messenger, may Allah keep you happy all your life. Then Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I wonder at these women who were with me and no sooner did they hear your voice, they immediately went behind the curtain. Thereupon 'Umar said: Allah's Messenger, you have more right that they should fear you. Then Umar (addressing the women) said: O ye enemies of yourselves, do you fear me and fear not the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him)? They said: Yes, you are harsh and strict as compared to the Messenger of Allah (may peace be upon him). Thereupon, Allah's Messenger (maypeace be upon him) said: By Him in Whose Hand is my life, if satan would encounter you in the way he would certainly take a different way from that of yours.
[5900]
Abu Huraira reported that Umar b. Khattab came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) while there were some women with him and they were raising their voices above the voice of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and when Umar sought permission to get into the house they went behind the curtain hurriedly. The rest of the hadith is the same.
[5901]
A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There had been among the people before you inspired persons and if there were any such among my Umma Umar b. Khattab would be one of them. Ibn Wahb explained the word Muhaddathun as those who receive hint from the High (Mulhamun).
[5902]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sa'd b. Ibrahim with the same chain of transmitters.
[5903]
Ibn Umar reported Umar as saying: My lord concorded with (my judgments) on three occasions. In case of the Station of Ibrahim, in case of the observance of veil and in case of the prisoners of Badr.
[5904]
Ibn Umar reported that when 'Abdullah b. Ubayy b. Salul (the hypocrite) died, his son Abdullah b. Abdullah came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon -him) and asked him to give his shirt which should be used for the coffin of his father. He gave that to him. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up to say prayer over him Thereupon I Umar caught hold of the clothe of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, are you going to offer prayer, whereas Allah has forbidden to offer prayer for him, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : Allah has given me a choice saying: Ask forgiveness for them or you may not ask for them; even if you ask for them seventy times, I will make an addition to the seventy. He was a hypocrite and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said prayer over him that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed the verse : "And never pray over any one of them that has died and never should you stand by his grave" (ix. 84).
[5905]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ubaidullah with the same chain of transmitter but with the addition of the words: "He abandoned saying prayer over the hypocrites who had died."
[5906]
A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was lying in the bed in my apartment with his thigh or his shank uncovered that Abu Bakr sought permission to get in. It was given to him and he conversed in the same very state (the Prophet's thigh or shank uncovered). Then 'Umar sought permission for getting in and it was given to him and he conversed in that very state. Then 'Uthman sought permission for getting in; Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sat down and he set right his clothes. Mubammad (one of the narrators) said: I do not say that it happened on the same day. He ('Uthman) then entered and conversed and as he went out, A'isha said : Abu Bakr entered aind you did not stir and did not observe much care (in arranging your clothes), then 'Umar entered and you did not stir and did not arrange your clothes, then 'Uthman entered and you got up and set your clothes right, thereupon he said: Should I not show modesty to one whom even the Angels show modesty.
[5907]
A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (mav peace be upon him), and Uthman both reported that Abu Bakr sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for entrance (in his apartment) as he had been lying on his bed covered with the bed-sheet of A'isha, and he gave permission to Abu Bakr in that very state and he, having his need fulfilled, went back. Then Umar sought permission and it was given to him in that very state and, after having his need fulfilled, he went back. And 'Uthman reported: Then I sought permission from him and he got up and raid to A'isha: Wrap yourself well with your cloth, then I got my need fulfilled and came back. And A'isha said: Allah's Messenger, why is it that I did not see you feeling any anxiety in case of dressing properly in the presence of Abu Bakr and 'Umar (Allah be pleased with them) as you showed in case of 'Uthman. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Verily Uthman is a person who is very modest and I was afraid that if I permitted him to enter in this very state he would not inform me of his need.
[5908]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Uthman and A'isha with the same wording.
[5909]
Abu Musa al-Ash'ari reported that while Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was in one of the gardens of Medina, reclining against a pillow and fixing a stick in a mud, that a person came asking for the gate to be opened, whereupon he said : Open it for him and give him glad tidings of Paradise and, lo, it was Abu Bakr. I opened (the gate) for him and gave him the glad tidings of Paradise. Then another person asked for the door to be opened, whereupon he said : Open it and give him the glad tidings of Piradise. He said : I went away and, lo, it was 'Umar. I opened it for him and gave him the glad tidings of Paradise. Then still another man asked for the door to be opened, and thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said : Open it and give him the glad tidings of Paradise after a trial would afflict him. I went and, lo, it was 'Uthman b. 'Affan. I opened the door and gave him the glad tidings of Paradise and informed him (what the Holy Prophet had said). Thereupon he said : O Allah, grant me steadfastness. Allah is one Whose help is to be sought.
[5910]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Musa al-Ash'ari with a slight variation of wording.
[5911]
Abu Musa Ash'ari reported that he performed ablution in his house and then came out saying: I would remain with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) the whole day long. He came to the mosque, and asked about Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). They (his Companions) said: He has gone in this direction. He (Abu Musa Ash'ari) said: I followed his steps asking about him until I came to Bi'r Aris (it is a well in the suburb of Medina). I sat by its wooden door until Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had relieved himself and then performed ablution. I went to him and he was sitting with his shanks uncovered hp to the knees and his legs dangl- ing in that well. I offered him salutations. I then came back and sat at the door as if I had been a chamberlain at the door of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) that day. There came Abu Bakr and knocked the door and I said: Who is it? He said: This is Abu Bakr. I said: Wait, please. I went and said: Allah's Messenger, here is Abu Bakr seeking permission. Thereupon he said: Admit him and give him glad tidings of Paradise. I came and I said to Abu Bakr to get in (and also told him) that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was giving him the glad tidings of Paradise. Abu Bakr got in and sat on the right side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and dangled his feet in the well as Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) had done, and he uncovered his shanks. I then returned and sat there and I had left my brother as he had been performing ablution and he was to meet me and I said: If Allah would intend goodness for such and such he would intend goodness for his brother and He would bring him. I was thinking this that a person stirred the door. I said: Who is it. He said: This is Umar b., Khattab. I said: Wait. Then I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), greeted him and said: Here is 'Umar seeking your. permission to get in. Thereupon he said: Let him come in and give him glad tid- ings of Paradise. I came to Umar and said: There is permission for you and glad tidings for you from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) for Paradise. He got in and sat on the left side of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) with his feet dangling in the well. I then returned and sat and said: If Allah would intend goodness for such and such (that is for his brother), He would bring him. And I was contemplat- ing over it that a man stirred the door and I said: Who is it? He said: This is Uthman b. Affan. I said: Wait, please. I then came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and informed him. and he said: Admit him and give him glad tidings (and inform) him of the turmoil which he shall have to face. I came and said: Get in, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) gives you the glad tidings of Paradise along with the trial which you shall have to face. He got in and saw the elevated plan round the well fully occupied. He sat on the other side. Sharik said that Sa'id b. al-Musayyib reported: I drew a conclusion from it that their groves would be (in this very state, the graves of Hadrat Abu Bakr, 'Umar Faruq by the tide of the Holy Prophet [may peace be upon him] and the grave of Hadrat 'Uthman away from their graves).
Abu Musa. reported: I set out with the intention (of meeting) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and came to know that he had gone to the gardens (in the suburb of Medina). I followed him and found him in a garden sitting upon an elevated place round the well with his shanks uncovered which had been dangling in the well. The rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation that there is no mention of the words of Sa'id: all drew a conclusion from it pertaining to their graves."
[5912]
Sa'id b. al-Musayyib reported Abu Musa Ash'ari having said that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) set out one day to the suburbs of Medina for reliev- ing himself. I followed his steps. The rest of the hadith is the same. Ibn Musayyib said: I concluded (from the manner of their sitting) the (order) of their graves. (The three) would be together (the graves of the Holy Prophet, Hadrat Abu Bakr and Hadrat Umar) and that of 'Uthman would be separate (from them).
[5913]
Amir b Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas reporte(l on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressing 'All said: You are in the same position with relation to me as Aaron-(Harun) was in relation to Moses but with (this explicit difference) that there is no prophet after me. Sa'd said : I had an earnest desire to hear it directly from Sa'd, so I met him and narrated to him what (his son) Amir had narrated to me, whereupon he said: Yes, I did hear it. I said: Did you hear it yourself? Thereupon he placed his fingers upon his ears and said: Yes, and if not, let both my ears become deaf.
[5914]
Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) left 'Ali b. Abi Talib behind him (as he proceeded) to the expedition of Tabuk, whereupon he ('Ali) said: Allah's Messenger, are you leaving me behind amongst women 4nd children ? Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Aren't you satisfied with being unto me what Aaron was unto Moses but with this exception that there would be no prophet after me.
[5915]
This hadith has been narrated.on the authority of Shu'ba with the same chain of transmitters. Amir b. Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas reported on the authority of his father that Muawiya b. Abi Sufyin appointed Sa'd as the Governor and said: What prevents you from abusing Abu Turab (Hadrat 'Ali), whereupon be said : It is because of three things which I remember Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said about him that I would not abuse him and even if I find one of those three things for me, it would be more dear to me than the red camelg. I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say about 'Ali as he left behind hrin in one of his campaigns (that was Tabuk). 'All said to him: Allah's Messenger, you leave me behind along with women and children. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: Aren't you satisfied with being unto me what Aaron was unto Moses but with this exception that there is no prophethood after me. And I (also) heard him say on the Day of Khaibar: I would certainly give this standard to a person who loves Allah and his Messenger and Allah and his Messenger love him too. He (the narrator) said: We have been anxiously waiting for it, when he (the Holy Prophet) said: Call 'Ali. He was called and his eyes were inflamed. He applied saliva to his eyes and handed over the standard to him, and Allah gave him victory. (The third occasion is this) when the (following) verse was revealed: "Let us summon our children and your children." Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called 'Ali, Fitima, Hasan and Husain and said: O Allah, they are my family.
[5916]
Sa'd reported Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as saying to 'Ali: Aren't you satisfied with being unto me what Aaron was unto Moses?
[5917]
Suhail reported on the authority of Abu Huraira that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said on the Day of Khaibar: I shall certainly give this standard in the hand of one who loves Allah and his Messenger and Allah will grant victory at his hand. Umar b. Khattab said: Never did I cherish for leadership but on that day. I came before him with the hope that I may be called for this, but Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) called 'Ali b. Abu Talib and he conferred (this honour) upon him and said: Proceed on and do not look about until Allah grants you victory, and 'Ali went a bit and then halted and did not look about and then said in a loud voice: Allah's Messenger, on what issue should I fight with the people? Thereupon he (the Prophet) said : Fight with them until they bear testimony to the fact that there is no god but Allah and Muhammad is his Messenger, and when they do that then their blood and their riches are inviolable from your hands but what is justified by law and their reckoning is with Allah.
[5918]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said on the Day of Khaibar : I would certainly give this standard to a person at whose hand Allah would grant victory and who loves Allah and His Messenger and Allah and His Messenger love him also. The people spent the night thinking as to whom it would be given. When it was morning the people hastened to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) all of them hoping that that would be given to him. He (the Holy Prophet) said: Where is 'Ali b. Abu Talib? They said: Allah's Messenger, his eyes are sore. He then sent for him and he was brought and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) applied saliva to his eyes and invoked blessings and he was all right, as if he had no ailment at all, and coraferred upon him the standard. 'Ali said: Allah's Messenger, I will fight them until they are like us. Thereupon he (the Holy Prophet) said: Advance cautiously until you reach their open places, thereafter invite them to Islam and inform them what is obligatory for them from the rights of Allah, for, by Allah, if Allah guides aright even one person through you that is better for you than to possess the most valuable of the camels.
[5919]
Salama b. Akwa' reported that it was 'Ali whom Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) left behind him (in the charge of his family and the Islamic State) on the occasion of the campaign of Khaibar, and his eyes were inflamed and he said: Is it for me to remain behind Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him)? So he went forth and rejoined Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and on the evening of that night (after which) next morning Allah granted victory. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: I will certainly give this standard to a man whom Allah and His Messenger love. or he said: Who loves Allah or His Messenger and Allah will grant him victory through him, and, lo, we saw 'Ali whom we least expected (to be present on that occasion). They (the Companions) said: Here is 'Ali. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon hin) gave him the standard. Allah granted victory at his hand.
[5920]
Yazid b. Hayyan reported, I went along with Husain b. Sabra and 'Umar b. Muslim to Zaid b. Arqam and, as we sat by his side, Husain said to him: Zaid. you have been able to acquire a great virtue that you saw Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) listened to his talk, fought by his side in (different) battles, offered prayer behind me. Zaid, you have in fact earned a great virtue. Zaid, narrate to us what you heard from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him). He said: I have grown old and have almost spent my age and I have forgotten some of the things which I remembered in connection with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), so accept whatever I narrate to you, and which I do not narrate do not compel me to do that. He then said: One day Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up to deliver sermon at a watering place known as Khumm situated between Mecca and Medina. He praised Allah, extolled Him and delivered the sermon and. exhorted (us) and said: Now to our purpose. O people, I am a human being. I am about to receive a messenger (the angel of death) from my Lord and I, in response to Allah's call, (would bid good-bye to you), but I am leaving among you two weighty things: the one being the Book of Allah in which there is right guidance and light, so hold fast to the Book of Allah and adhere to it. He exhorted (us) (to hold fast) to the Book of Allah and then said: The second are the members of my household I remind you (of your duties) to the members of my family. He (Husain) said to Zaid: Who are the members of his household? Aren't his wives the members of his family? Thereupon he said: His wives are the members of his family (but here) the members of his family are those for whom acceptance of Zakat is forbidden. And he said: Who are they? Thereupon he said: 'Ali and the offspring of 'Ali, 'Aqil and the offspring of 'Aqil and the offspring of Ja'far and the offspring of 'Abbas. Husain said: These are those for whom the acceptance of Zakat is forbidden. Zaid said: Yes.
[5921]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zaid b. Arqam through another chain of transmitters.
[5922]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Hayyan but with this addition: "The Book of Allah contains right guidance, the light, and whoever adheres to it and holds it fast, he is upon right guidance and whosoever deviates from it goes astray.
[5923]
Yazid b. Hayyan reported: We went to him (Zaid b. Arqam) and said to him. You have found goodness (for you had the honour) to live in the company of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and offered prayer behind him, and the rest of the hadith is the same but with this variation of wording that lie said: Behold, for I am leaving amongst you two weighty things, one of which is the Book of Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, and that is the rope of Allah. He who holds it fast would be on right guidance and he who abandons it would be in error, and in this (hadith) these words are also found: We said: Who are amongst the members of the household ? Aren't the wives (of the Holy Prophet) included amongst the members of his house hold? Thereupon he said: No, by Allah, a woman lives with a man (as his wife) for a certain period; he then divorces her and she goes back to her parents and to her people; the members of his household include his ownself and his kith and kin (who are related to him by blood) and for him the acceptance of Zakat is prohibited.
[5924]
Sahl b. Sa'd reported that a person from the offspring of Marwan was appointed as the governor of Medina. He called Sahl b. Sa'd and ordered him to abuse All Sahl refused to do that. He (the governor) said to him: If you do not agree to it (at least) say: May Allah curse Abu Turab. Sahl said: There was no name dearer to All than Abu Turab (for it was given to him by the Holy Prophet himself) and he felt delighted when he was called by this name. He (the governor) said to him: Narrate to us the story of his being nanied as Abu Turab. He said: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to the house of Fatima and he did not find 'Ali in the house; whereupon he said: Where is your uncle's son? She said: (There cropped up something) between me and him which had annoyed him with me. He went out and did not rest here. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to a person to find out where he was. He came and said: Allah's Messenger, he is sleeping in the mosque. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came to him and found him lying in the mosque and saw that his mantle had slipped from his back and his back was covered with dust and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) began to wipe it away from him (from the body of Hadrat 'Ali) saying: Get up, covered with dust; get up, covered with dust.
[5925]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) lay on bed during one night and said: Were there a pious person from amongst my companions who should keep a watch for me during the nightt? She said: We heard the noise of arms, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Who is it ? And Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas said: Allah's MesseDger. I have come to serve as your sentinel. 'A'isha said: Allah' s Messenger (may peace be upon him) slept (such a sound sleep) that I heard the noise of his snoring.
[5926]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) laid down on bed during one night on his arrival at Medina and said: Were there a pious person from amongst my Companions who should keep a watch for me durin. the night? She (A'isha) reported: We were in this state that we heard the clanging noise of arms. lie (the Holy Prophet) said: Who is it? He said: This is Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to him: What brings you here? Thereupon he said: I harboured fear (lest any harm should come to) Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), so I came to serve as your sentinel. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) invoked blessings upon him. He then slept. This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Ibn Rumh with a slight variation of wording.
[5927]
'Abdullah b. 'Amir b. Rabi reported A'isha as saying: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) went to bed one night; the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5928]
'Abdullah b. Shaddad reported that he heard 'Allahs saying: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) did not gather his parents except in case of Sa'd b. Malik that he said to him on the Day of Ubud: Shoot an arrow, may my father and mother be taken as ransom for you.
[5929]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'Ali through another chain of transmitters.
[5930]
Sa'd b Abi Waqqqs said: Allah's Messenger (may peace he upon him) gathered his parents for me on the Day of Uhud.
[5931]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Yabyl b. Sa'id with the same chain of transmitters.
[5932]
'Amir b. Sa'd reported oLi the authority of his father that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) gathered for him on the Day of Uhud his parents when a polytheist had set fire to (i.e. attacked fiercely) the Muslims. Thereupon Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) said to him: (Sa'd), shoot an arrow, (Sa'd), may my mother and father be taken as ransom for you. I drew an arrow and I shot a featherless arrow at him aiming his side that lie fell down and his private parts were exposed. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) laughed that I saw his front teeth.
[5933]
Mus'ab b. Sa'd reported on the authority of his father that many verses of the Qur'an had been revealed in connection with him. His mother Umm Sa'd had taken oath that she would never talk with him until he abandoned his faith and she neither ate nor drank and said: Allah has commanded you to treat well your parents and I am your mother and I command you to do this. She passed three days in this state until she fainted because of extreme hunger and at that time her son whose name was Umara stood up and served her drink and she began to curse Sa'd that Allah, the Exalted and Glorions, revealed these verses of the Holy Qur'an: "And We have enjoined upon a person goodness to his parents but if they contend with thee to associate (others) with Me of which you have no knowledge, then obey them not" (xxix. 8); Treat thein with customary good in this world" (xxxi. 15). He also reported that there fell to the lot of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) huge spoils of war and there was one sword in them. I picked that up and came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Bestow this sword upon me (as my share in the spoils of war) and you know my state. Thereupon he said: Return it to the place from where you picked it up. I went back until I decided to throw it in a store but my soul repulsed me so I came back and asked him to give that sword to me. He said in a loud voice to return it to the place from where I had picked it up. It was on this occasion that this verse was revealed: "They asked about the spoils of war" (viii. 1). He further said: I once fell ill and sent a message to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). He visited me and I said to him: Permit me to distribute (in charity) my property as much as I like. He did not agree. I said: (Permit me to distribute) half of it. He did not agree. I said : (Permit me to distribute) the third part, whereupon he kept quiet and it was after this (that the distribution of one's property in charity) to the extent of one-third was held valid. He further said: I came to a group of persons of the Ansir and Muhajirin and they said: Come, so that we may serve you wine, and it was before the use of wine had been prohibited. I went to them in a garden and there had been with them the roasted head of a camel and a small water-skin containing wine. I ate and drank along with them and there came under discussion the Ansr (Helpers) and Muhajirin (immigrants). I said : The immigrants are better than the Ansar, that a person picked up a portion of the head (of the camel and struck me with it that my nose was injured. I came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and informed him of the situation that Aliah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed verses pertaining to wine: "Intoxicants and the games of chance and (sacrificing to) stones set up and (divining by) arrows are only an uncleanliness, the devil's work" (v. 90).
[5934]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Simak and the hadith transmitted on the authority of Shu'ba (the words are) : When they intended to feed her (Sa'd'.s mother), they opened her mouth with the help of a stick and then put the feed in her mouth, and in the same hadith the words are: He struck the nose of Sa'd and it was injured and Sa'd had (the mark) of wound on his nose.
[5935]
Sa'd reported: This verse was revealed in relation to six persons and I and Ibn Mas'ud were amongst them. The polytheists said to him (the Holy Prophet) : Do not keep such persons near you. It was upon this that (this verse was revealed) : "Drive not away those who call upon their Lord morning and evening desiring only His pleasure" (vi. 52).
[5936]
Sa'd reported: We were six men in the company of Allah's Messenger (,nay peace be upon him) that the polytheists said to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) : Drive them away so that they may not be overbold upon us. He said : I, Ibn Mas'ud and a person from the tribe of Hudhail, Bilal and two other persons, whose names I do not know (were amongst such persons). And there occurred to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) what. Allah wished and he talked with himself that Allah, the Exalted and Glorious, revealed: "Do not drive away those who call their Lord morning and evening desiring to seek His pleasure."
[5937]
Abu 'Uthman reported on one of the days when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was fighting and none remained with him save Talha and Sa'd.
[5938]
Jabir b. Abdullah reported: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) exhorting people on the Day of the Battle of the Ditch to fight. Zubair said: I am ready (to participate). He then again exhorted and he again said : I am ready to participate. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Behold. for every Prophet there is a helper and my helper is Zubair.
[5939]
Jabir reported this hadith through another chain of transmitters.
[5940]
'Abdullah b. Zubair reported on the Day of the Battle of the Trench: I and Umar b. Abu Salama were with women folk in the fort of Hassan (b. Thabit). He at one time leaned for me and I cast a glance and at anothertime I leaned for him and he would see and I recognised my father as he rode on his horse with his arms towards the tribe of Quraizah. 'Abdullah b. 'Urwa reported from Abdullah b. Zubair: I made a mention of that to my father, whereupon he said: My son, did you see me (on that occasion) ? He said: Yes. Thereupon he said: By Allah, Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) addressed me saying : I would sacrifice for thee my father and my mother.
[5941]
'Abdullah b. Zubair reported: When it was the Day of the Battle of the Ditch I and 'Umar b. Salama were in the fort in which there were women, i.e. the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him); the rest of the hadith is the same.
[5942]
Abu Huraira reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was upon the mountain of Hira,' and there were along with him Abu Bakr, Umar, Uthman. 'Ali, Talha, 'Zubair, that the mountain stirred; thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : Be calm, there is none upon you but a Prophet, a Fiddle (the testifier of truth) and a Martyr.
[5943]
Abu Huraira reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was on the mountain of Hira' that it stirred; thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Hira! be calm, for there is none upon you but a Prophet, a Siddiq, a Shahid, and there were upon it Allah's Prophet (may peace be upon him), Abu Bakr, 'Umar, Uthman, 'Ali, Talha, Zubair, Sa'd b. Abi Waqqas (Allah be pleased witli them).
[5944]
Hisham reported on the authority of his father ('Urwa b. Zubair) that A'isha said : BY Allah, both fathers of yours are amongst those who have been men. tioned in this verse: "Those who responded to the call of Allah and the Messenger after the misfortune had fallen upon thein" .
[5945]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hishan through the same chain of transmitters but with this addition (that by both fathers of yours) he meant Abu Bakr and Zubair.
[5946]
'Urwa reported: 'Aisha said to me: Your fathers (Zubair and Abu Bakr) were amongst those about whom (it has been revealed): "Those who responded to the call of Allah and His Messenger after the misfortune had fallen upon them."
[5947]
Anas reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: For every Umma there is a man of trust and the man of trust of this Umma is Abu 'Ubaida b. Jarrah.
[5948]
Anas reported that the people of Yemen came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Send with us a person who should teach us Sunnah and al-Islam, whereupon he (the Holy Prophet) caught hold of the hand of Ubaida and said: He is a man of trust of this Umma.
[5949]
Hudhaifa reported that the people of Najran came to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, send along with us a man of trust; whereupon he said: I would definitely send to you a man of trust, a man of trust in the true sense of the term. Thereupon his Companions looked up eagerly and he sent Abu Ubaida b. Jarrah.
[5950]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Abu Ishaq with the same chain of transmitters.
[5951]
Abu Huraira reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying to Hasan: O Allah, behold, I love him. Thou too love him and love one who loves him.
[5952]
Abu Huraira reported: I went along with Allalh's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at a time during the day but he did not talk to me and I did not talk to him until he reached Bazar of Banfi Qainuqal. He came back to the tent of Fatima and said: Is the little chap (meaning Hasan) there ? We were under the impression that his mother had detained him in order to bathe him and dress him and garland him with a sweet garland. Not much time had passed that he (Hasan) came running until both of them embraced each other, thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: O Allah, I love him; love him Thou and love one who loves him (Hasan).
[5953]
Al-Bara' b. Azib reported: I saw Hasan b. 'Ali upon the shoulders of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and he was saying: O Allah, I love him, and love him Thou.
[5954]
Iyas reported on the authority of his father: I (had the honour of) leading the white mule on which rode Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and with him were Hasan and Husain, till it reached the apartment of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him). The one amongst them was seated before him and the other one was seated behind him.
[5955]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) went out one norning wearing a striped cloak of the black camel's hair that there came Hasan b. 'Ali. He wrapped hitn under it, then came Husain and he wrapped him under it along with the other one (Hasan). Then came Fatima and he took her under it, then came 'Ali and he also took him under it and then said: Allah only desires to take away any uncleanliness from you, O people of the household, and purify you (thorough purifying)
[5956]
Salim b. 'Abdullah reported on the authority of his father: We were in the habit of calling Zaid b. Harith as Zaid b. Muhammad until it was revealed in the Qur'an: "Call them by the names of their fathers. This is more equitable with Allah" (This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Qutaiba b. Sa'd)
[5957]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority 'Abdullah through another chain of transmitters.
[5958]
Ibn 'Umar reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent an expedition and appointed Usama b. Zaid as its chief. The people objected to his command, whereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) stood up and said: You object to his command and before this you objected to the command of his father (Zaid). By Allah, he was fit as the commander and he was one of the dearest of persons to me and after him, behold! this one (Usama) is one of the dearest of persons to me.
[5959]
Salim reported on the authority of his father that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said on the pulpit: You object to the command of Usima b. Zaid as you had objected before to the command of his father (Zaid). By Allah, he was most competent for it and, by Allah, he was dearest to me amongst people and, by Allah, the same is the case with Usama b. Zaid. He is most dear to me after him and I advise you to treat him well for he is pious amongst you.
[5960]
Abdullah b. Abu Mulaika reported that Abdullah b. Jafar said to Ibn Zubair: Do you remember (the occasion) when we three (i.e. I, you and lbn 'Abbas) met Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and he mounted us (on his camel) but left you? He said: Yes.
[5961]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Habib b. Ash-Shahid.
[5962]
Abdullah b. Ja'far reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be, upon him) came back from a journey, the children of his family used to accord him welcome. It was in this way that once he came back from a journey and I went to him first of all. He mounted me before him. Then there came one of the two sons of Fatima and he mounted him behind him and this is how we three entered Medina riding on a beast.
[5963]
Abdullah b. Ja'a'far reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came back from a journey he met us. Once he met me, Hasan or Husain, and he mounted one of us before him and the other one behind him until we entered Medina.
[5964]
Abdullah b. Ja'far reported that one day Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) mounted me behind him and narrated to me something in secret which I would narrate to none amongst people.
[5965]
Abdullah b. Ja'far reported that he heard 'All say in Kulfa that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: The best of the women of her time was Mary, daughter of 'Imran, and the best of the women of her time was Khadija, daughter of khuwailid. Abu Kuraib said that Wakil pointed towards the sky and the earth
[5966]
Abu Musa reported Allali's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: There are many persons amongst men who are quite perfect but there are not perfect amongst women except Mary, daughter of 'Imran, Asiya wife of Pharaoh, and the excellence of 'A'isha as compared to women is that of Tharid over all other foods.
[5967]
Abu Huraira reported that Gabriel came to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and said: Allah's Messenger, lo. Khadija is coming to you with a vessel of seasoned food or drink. When she comes to you, offer her greetings from her Lord, the Exalted and Glorious, and on my behalf and give her glad tidings of a palace of jewels in Paradise wherein there is no noise and no toil. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Abu Huraira through another chain of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[5968]
Ismail reported: I said to 'Abdullah b. Abi Aufa: Did Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) give glad tidings of Paradise to Khadija ? He said : Yes. He did give glad tidings to her of a palace of jewels in Paradise wherein there would be no noise and no toil.
[5969]
This hadith has been narrated on the a tliority of Ibn Abi Aufa through other chains of transmitters.
[5970]
'A'isha reported that Allali's, Messenger (may peace he upon him) gave grid tidings to Khadija int Khuwailid of a palace in Paradise.
[5971]
'A'isha reported: Never did I feel jealous of any woman as I was jealous of Khadija. She had died three years before he (the Holy Prophet) married me. I often heard him praise her, and his lord, the Exalted and Glorious, had commanded him to give her the glad tidings of a palace of jewels in Paradise: and whenever he slaughtered a sheep he presented (its meat) to her female companions.
[5972]
'A'isha reported: Never did I feel jealous of the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) but in case of Khadija, although I did no, (have the privilege to) see her. She further added that whenever Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) slaughtered a sheep, he said : Send it to the companions of Khadija I annoyed him one day and said : (It is) Khadija only who always prevails upon your mind. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said: Her love had been nurtured in my heart by Allah Himself.
[5973]
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Abu Usama up to the slaughtering of a sheep, but he. did not make mention of the subsequent words.
[5974]
'A'isha reported : Never did I feel jealous of any wife amongst the wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) as I feel in case of Khadija (though I had never seen her), for he praised her very often.
[5975]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) did not marry any other woman till her (Khadija's) death.
[5976]
A'isha reported that Hala b.Khuwailid (sister of Khadija)sought permission from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) to see him and he was reminded of Khadija's (manner of) asking leave to enter and (was overwhelmed) with emotions thereby and said: O Allah, it is Hala, daughter of Khuwailid, and I felt jealous and said: Why do you remember one of those old women of the Quraish with gums red and who is long dead-while Allah has given you a better one in her stead ?
[5977]
'A'isha reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) having said: I saw you in a dream for three nights when an angel brought you to me in a silk cloth and he said: Here is your wife, and when I removed (the cloth) from your face, lo, it was yourself, so I said: If this is from Allah, let Him carry it out.
[5978]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters.
[5979]
'A'isha reported: Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: I can well discern when you are pleased with me and when you are annoyed with me. I said: How do you discern it ? Thereupon be said: When you are pleased with me you say; "No, by the Lord of Muhammad," and when you are annoyed with me, you say: "No, by the Lord of Ibrahim." I said: Allah's Messenger, by Allah, I in fact leave your name (when I am annoyed with you).
[5980]
This hadith has been reported on the authority of Hishim b. 'Urwa with the same chain of transmitters up to the words: "No, by the Lord of Ibrahim," and he did not make mention of what follows subsequently.
[5981]
'A'isha reported that she used to play with dolls in the presence of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and when her playmates came to her they left (the house) because they felt shy of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), whereas Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) sent them to her.
[5982]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham with the same chain of transmitters with a slight variation of wording.
[5983]
'A'isha reported that people sent their gifts when it was the turn of 'A'isha seeking thereby the pleasure of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him).
[5984]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), said: The wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) sent Fatima, the daughter of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him), to Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him).She ouaht permission to get in as he had been lying with me in my mantle. He gave her permission and she said : Allah's Messenger, verily, your wives have sent me to you in order to ask you to observe equity in case of the daughter of Abu Quhafa. She ('A'isha) said: I kept quiet. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to her (Fatima): 0 daughter, don't you love whom I love? She said: Yes, (I do). Thereupon he said: I love this one. Fatima then stood up as she heard this from Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and went to the wives of Allatt's Apostle (may peace be upon him) and informed them of what she had said to him and what Allah's messenger (may peace be upon him) had said to her. Thereupon they said to her: We think that you have been of no avail to us. You may again go to Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and tell him that his wives seek equity in case of the daughter of Abu Quhafa. Fitima said: By Allah, I will never talk to him about this matter. 'A'isha (further) reported: The wives of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him) then sent Zainab b. jahsh, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), and she was one who was somewhat equal in rank with me in the eyes of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) and I have never seen a woman more advanced in religious piety than Zainab, more God-conscious, more truthful, more alive to the ties of blood, more generous and having more.sense of self-sacrifice in practical life and having more charitable disposition and thus more close to God, the Exalted, than her. She, however, lost temper very soon but was soon calm. Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) permitted her to enter as she ('A'isha) was along with Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) in her mantle, in the same very state when Fatima had entered. She said: Allah's Messenger, your wives have sent me to you seeking equity in case of the daughter of Abu Quhafa. She then came to me and showed harshness to me and I was seeing the eyes of Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) whether he would permit me. Zainab went on until I came to know that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) would not disapprove if I retorted. Then I exchanged hot words until I made her quiet. Thereupon Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) smiled and said: She is the daughter of Abu Bakr. This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zuhri with the same chain of transmitters, but with a slight variation of wording.
[5985]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) during his last illness) inquired : Where I would be tomorrow, where I would be tomorrow (thinking, that the turn of 'A'isha was not very near) and when it was my turn, Allah called him to his Heavenly Home and his head was between my neck and chest.
[5986]
A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) at the time of breathing his last was reclining against her chest and she was leaning over him and listening to him as he was saying: O Allah, grant me pardon, show mercy to me, enjoin me to companions (on High).
[5987]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Hisham through another chain of transmitters.
[5988]
'A'isha reported : I heard that never a prophet dies until he is given an option to opt the life of (this) world or that of the Hereafter. She further said: I heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say in his last illness in which he' died. I heard him saying in gruffness of the voice: Along with those persons upon whom Allah bestowed favours from amongst the Apostles, the testifiers of truth, the martyrs, the pious and goodly company are they (iv. 69). (It was on bearing these words) that I thought that he had been given choice (and he opted to live with these pious persons in the Paradise).
[5989]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Sa'd with the same chain of transmitters.
[5990]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that he used to say: Never a prophet dies in a state that he is not made to see his abode in Paradise, and then given a choice. 'A'isha said that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) was about to leave the world, his head was over her thigh and he had fallen into swoon three times. When he felt relief his eyes were fixed at the ceiling. He then said: O Allah, along with the high companions (i.e. along with the Apostles who live in the most elevated place of the Paradise). (On hearing these words), I then said (to myself) He is not going to opt us and I remembered a hadith which he had narrated to us as he was healthy and in which he said: No prophet dies until he sees his abode in Paradise, he is then given a choice. 'A'isha said : These were the last words which Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) spoke (the words are) : O Allah, with companions on High.
[5991]
'A'isha reported that when Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) set ont on a journey, he used to cast lots amongst his wives. Once this lot came out in my favour and that of Hafsa. They (Hafsi, and 'A'isha) both went along with him and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) used to travel (on camel)when it was night along with 'A'isha and talked with her. Hafsa said to 'A'isha: Would you like to ride upon my camel tonight and allow me to ride upon your camel and you would see (what you do not generally see) and I would see (what I do not see) generally ? She said: Yes. So 'A'isha rode upon the camel of Hafsa and Hafsa rode upon the camel of 'A'isha and Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) came near the camel of 'A'isha. (whereas) Hafsa had been riding over that. He greeted her and then rode with her until they came down. She ('A'isha) thus missed (the company of the Holy Prophet) and when they sat down, 'A'isha felt jealous. She put her foot in the grass and said : O Allah, let the scorpion sting me or the serpent bite me. And so far as thy Messenger is concerned, I cannot say anything about him.
[5992]
Anas b. Malik reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: The excellence of 'A'isha over women is like the excellence of Tharid over all other foods.
[5993]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Anas b. Malik through other chains of transmitters.
[5994]
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to her: Gabriel offered you greetings and I said: So there should be peace and mercy of Allah upon him.
[5995]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of 'A'isha through another chain of transmitters.
[5996]
This hadith has been narrated on the authority of Zakriyya' through another chain of transmitters.
[5997]
'A'isha, the wife of Allah's Apostle (may peace be upon him), reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said : 'A'isha, here is Gabriel offering you greetings. She said: I made a reply : Let there be peace and blessings of Allah upon him, and added: He sees what I do not see.
Chapter : THE HADITH OF UMM ZARA
[5998]
'A'isha reported that (one day) there sat together eleven women making an explicit promise amongst themselves that they would conceal nothing about their spouses. The first one said: My husband is a sort of the meat of a lean camel placed at the top of a hill, which it is difficult to climb up, nor (the meat) is good enough that one finds in oneself the urge to take it away (from the top of that mountain).
The second one said: My husband (is so bad) that I am afraid I would not be able to describe his faults-both visible and invisible completely.
The third one said: My husband is a long-statured fellow (i.e. he lacks intelligence). If I give vent to my feelings about him, he would divorce me, and if I keep quiet I would be made to live in a state of suspense (neither completely abandoned by him nor entertained as wife).
The fourth one said: My husband is like the night of Tihama (the night of Hijaz and Mecca), neither too cold nor hot, neither there is any fear of him nor grief.
The fifth one said: My husband is (like) a leopard as he enters the house, and behaves like a lion when he gets out, and he does not ask about that which he leaves in the house.
The sixth one said: So far as my husband is concerned, he eats so much that nothing is left back and when he drinks he drinks that no drop is left behind.And when he lies down he wraps his body and does not touch me so that he may know my grief.
The seventh one said: My husband is heavy in spirit, having no brightness in him, impotent, suffering from all kinds of conceivable diseases, heaving such rough manners that he may break my head or wound my body, or may do both.
The eighth one said: My husband is as sweet as the sweet-smelling plant, and as soft as the softness of the hare.
The ninth one said: My husband is the master of a lofty building, long-statured, having heaps of ashes (at his door)and his house is near the meeting place and the inn.
The tenth one said: My husband is Malik, and how fine Malik is, much above appreciation and praise (of mine). He has many folds of his camel, more in number than the pastures for them. When they (the camels) hear the sound of music they become sure that they are going to be slaughtered.
The eleventh one said: My husband is Abu Zara'. How fine Abu Zara' is ! He has suspended in my ears heavy ornaments and (fed me liberally) that my sinews and bones are covered with fat. So he made me happy. He found me among the shepherds living in the side of the mountain, and he made me the owner of the horses, camels and lands and heaps of grain and he finds no fault with me. I sleep and get up in the morning (at my own sweet will) and drink to my heart's content. The mother of Abu Zara', how fine is the mother of Abu Zara'! Her bundles are heavily packed (or receptacles in her house are filled to the brim) and the house quite spacious. So far as the son of Abu Zara' is concerned, his bed is as soft as a green palm-stick drawn forth from its bark, or like a sword drawn forth from its scabbard, and whom just an arm of a lamb is enough to satiate. So far as the daughter of Abu Zara' is concerned, how fine is the daughter of Abu Zara', obedient to her father, obedient to her mother, wearing sufficient flesh and a source of jealousy for her co-wife. As for the slave-girl of Abu Zara', how fine is she ; she does not disclose our affairs to others (outside the four walls of the house). She does not remove our wheat, or provision, or take it forth, or squander it, but she preserves it faithfully (as a sacred trust). And she does not let the house fill with rubbish. One day Abu Zara' went out (of his house) when the milk was churned in the vessels, that he met a woman, having two children like leopards playing with her pomegranates (chest) under her vest. He divorced me (Umm Zara') and married that woman (whom Abu Zara') met on the way. I (Umm Zara') later on married another person, a chief, who was an expert rider, and a fine archer: he bestowed upon me many gifts and gave me one pair of every kind of animal and said: Umm Zara', make use of everything (you need) and send forth to your parents (but the fact) is that even if I combine all the gifts that he bestowed upon me, they stand no comparison to the least gift of Abu Zara'.
'A'isha reported that Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) said to me: I am for you as Abu Zara' was for Umm Zara'.
This hadith has been transmitted on the authority of Hisham b. 'Urwa but with a slight variation of wording.
[5999]
Miswar b. Makhramali reported that he heard Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) say, as he sat on the pulpit: The sons of Hisham b. Mughira have asked my permission to marry their daughter with 'Ali b. Abi Talib (that refers to the daughter of Abu Jahl for whom 'All had sent a proposal for marriage). But I would not allow them, I would not allow them, I would not allow them (and the only alternative possible is) that 'Ali should divorce my daughter (and then marry their daughter), for my daughter is part of me. He who disturbs her in fact disturbs me and he who offends her offends me.
[6000]
Miswar b. Makhramah reported Allah's Messenger (may peace be upon him) as saying: Fatima is a part of me. He in fact tortures me who tortures her.